How to make a JTable non-editable How to make a JTable non-editable? I don't want my users to be able to edit the values in cells by double-clicking them. Any help would be greatly appreciated. Thanks.
What does the ^ operator do in Java? What function does the ^ (caret) operator serve in Java? When I try this: ...it gives me: for n = 5, returns 0 for n = 4, returns 1 for n = 6, returns 3 ...so I guess it doesn't perform exponentiation. But what is it then?
Why doesn't the JVM cache JIT compiled code? The canonical JVM implementation from Sun applies some pretty sophisticated optimization to bytecode to obtain near-native execution speeds after the code has been run a few times. The question is, why isn't this compiled code cached to disk for use during subsequent uses of the same function/class. As it stands, every time a program is executed, the JIT compiler kicks in afresh, rather than using a pre-compiled version of the code. Wouldn't adding this feature add a significant boost to the initial run time of the program, when the bytecode is essentially being interpreted?
Should I instantiate instance variables on declaration or in the constructor? Is there any advantage for either approach? Example 1: Example 2:
How to write console output to a txt file I have tried to write the console output to a txt file using this code suggestion (http://www.daniweb.com/forums/thread23883.html#) however I was not successful. What's wrong? create a buffered reader that connects to the console, we use it so we can read lines read a line from the console create an print writer for writing to a file output to the file a line close the file (VERY IMPORTANT!)
Which programming languages can I use on Android Dalvik? In theory, Dalvik executes any virtual machine byte code, created for example with the compilers of AspectJ ColdFusion Clojure Groovy JavaFX Script JRuby Jython Rhino Scala Are there already working versions of bytecode compilers for Dalvik available for other languages than Java?
Hibernate Criteria returns children multiple times with FetchType.EAGER I have an Order class that has a list of OrderTransactions and I mapped it with a one-to-many Hibernate mapping like so: These Orders also have a field orderStatus, which is used for filtering with the following Criteria: This works and the result is as expected. Now here is my question: Why, when I set the fetch type explicitly to EAGER, do the Orders appear multiple times in the resulting list? How would I have to change my Criteria code to reach the same result with the new setting?
Problem unmarshalling parcelables I've got a few classes that implement Parcelable and some of these classes contain each other as properties. I'm marshalling the classes into a Parcel to pass them between activities. Marshalling them TO the Parcel works fine, but when I try to unmarshall them I get the following error: The LayoverType class (where it's failing): readParcelable writeParcelable writeLong readLong for implementing Parcelable it's failing here Here's the LocationType class: writeString writeInt readDouble readInt writeDouble readString for implementing Parcelable Update 2: As far as I can tell it's failing at the following bit of code (from Parcel's source): Why is it not able to find the class? It both exists and implements Parcelable.
Method has the same erasure as another method in type Why is it not legal to have those two methods in the same class? I get the compilation error Method add(Set) has the same erasure add(Set) as another method in type Test. while I can work around it, I was wondering why javac doesn't like this. I can see that in many cases, the logic of those two methods would be very similar and could be replaced by a single method, but this is not always the case. This is extra annoying if you want to have two constructors that takes those arguments because then you can't just change the name of one of the constructors.
Apache Tomcat Not Showing in Eclipse Server Runtime Environments I have tomcat 5.5 installed, running and verifiable at http://localhost:8080/. The Tomcat menu option appears in the Eclipse menu bar and I can start and stop Tomcat from there. In Eclipse, it does not show as a Server Runtime Environment in Window - Preferences - Server - Runtime Environments, nor does it appear in the list of environments that can be added when I click the "Add" button. All I see is the J2EE Runtime Library. Edit: Running on Windows XP. Eclipse version is 3.5.1
Override back button to act like home button On pressing the back button, I'd like my application to go into the stopped state, rather than the destroyed state. In the Android docs it states: ...not all activities have the behavior that they are destroyed when BACK is pressed. When the user starts playing music in the Music application and then presses BACK, the application overrides the normal back behavior, preventing the player activity from being destroyed, and continues playing music, even though its activity is no longer visible How do I replicate this functionality in my own application? I think there must be three possibilities... Capture the back button press (as below) and then call whatever method(s) the home button calls. Capture the back button press and then spoof a home button press. Capture the back button press, then start an Activity of the home screen, effectively putting my application's Activity into the stopped state. Edit: I know about services and am using one in the application to which this problem is related. This question is specifically about putting the Activity into the stopped state rather than the destroyed state on pressing the back button.
Overriding private methods in Java As succinctly described here, overriding private methods in Java is invalid because a parent class's private methods are "automatically final, and hidden from the derived class". My question is largely academic. How is it not a violation of encapsulation to not allow a parent's private method to be "overridden" (ie, implemented independently, with the same signature, in a child class)? A parent's private method cannot be accessed or inherited by a child class, in line with principles of encapsulation. It is hidden. So, why should the child class be restricted from implementing its own method with the same name/signature? Is there a good theoretical foundation for this, or is this just a pragmatic solution of some sort? Do other languages (C++ or C#) have different rules on this?
What is the difference between java and core java? When looking at job openings on-line, I noticed that some openings required knowledge of "core Java". What is core java and how is different from java?
How to make ThreadPoolExecutor's submit() method block if it is saturated? I want to create a ThreadPoolExecutor such that when it has reached its maximum size and the queue is full, the sumbit() method blocks when trying to add new tasks. Do I need to implement a custom RejectedExecutionHandler for that or is there an existing way to do this using standard java library?
Override Java System.currentTimeMillis for testing time sensitive code Is there a way, either in code or with JVM arguments, to override the current time, as presented via System.currentTimeMillis, other than manually changing the system clock on the host machine? A little background: We have a system that runs a number of accounting jobs that revolve much of their logic around the current date (ie 1st of the month, 1st of the year, etc) Unfortunately, a lot of the legacy code calls functions such as new Date() or Calendar.getInstance(), both of which eventually call down to System.currentTimeMillis. For testing purposes, right now, we are stuck with manually updating the system clock to manipulate what time and date the code thinks that the test is being run. So my question is: Is there a way to override what is returned by System.currentTimeMillis? For example, to tell the JVM to automatically add or subtract some offset before returning from that method? Thanks in advance!
JPA getSingleResult() or null I have an insertOrUpdate method which inserts an Entity when it doesn't exist or update it if it does. To enable this, I have to findByIdAndForeignKey, if it returned null insert if not then update. The problem is how do I check if it exists? So I tried getSingleResult. But it throws an exception if the but getSingleResult throws an Exception. Thanks
com.jcraft.jsch.JSchException: UnknownHostKey I'm trying to use Jsch to establish an SSH connection in Java. My code produces the following exception: I cannot find how to verify the host key in the Jsch documentation. I have included my code below. println com.jcraft.jsch.JSch setPassword connect com.jcraft.jsch.Session getSession create SSH connection
In what order do static/instance initializer blocks in Java run? Say a project contains several classes, each of which has a static initializer block. In what order do those blocks run? I know that within a class, such blocks are run in the order they appear in the code. I've read that it's the same across classes, but some sample code I wrote disagrees with that. I used this code: println Instance init block Constructor Static init block Static init block Instance init block Constructor Constructor Static init block Instance init block and got this output: START static - grandparent static - parent static - child instance - grandparent constructor - grandparent instance - parent constructor - parent instance - child constructor - child END The obvious answer from that is that parents' blocks run before their children's, but that could just be a coincidence and doesn't help if two classes aren't in the same hierarchy. EDIT: I modified my example code by appending this to LoadTest.java: println Constructor Instance init block Static init block As implied by the class name, I never referenced the new class anywhere. The new program produced the same output as the old one.
Strings are objects in Java, so why don't we use 'new' to create them? We normally create objects using the new keyword, like: Strings are objects, yet we do not use new to create them: Why is this? Can I make a String with new?
Equivalent of C#'s DateTime.Now in Java? How do I get the current date in Java? In C# it is DateTime.Now.
How do you return a JSON object from a Java Servlet How do you return a JSON object form a Java servlet. Previously when doing AJAX with a servlet I have returned a string. Is there a JSON object type that needs to be used, or do you just return a String that looks like a JSON object e.g.
@AspectJ pointcut for all methods of a class with specific annotation I want to monitor all public methods of all Classes with specified annotation (say @Monitor) (note: Annotation is at class level). What could be a possible pointcut for this? Note: I am using @AspectJ style Spring AOP.
JPA OneToMany not deleting child I have a problem with a simple @OneToMany mapping between a parent and a child entity. All works well, only that child records are not deleted when I remove them from the collection. The parent: The child: If I now delete and child from the childs Set, it does not get deleted from the database. I tried nullifying the child.parent reference, but that did not work either. The entities are used in a web application, the delete happens as part of an Ajax request. I don't have a list of deleted childs when the save button is pressed, so I can't delete them implicitly.
Hibernate Auto Increment ID I have a j2ee application using hibernate with annotation. How do I annotate the Id field in my pojo class to set it as auto increment or auto generated. and in adding the bean do I leave that field in my bean null?
Compiling a java program into an executable Possible Duplicate: How do I create an .exe for a Java program? I've just made a simple program with eclipse and I want to compile it into an executable, but simply can't seem to find out how to do it. Please help.
C# developers learning Java, what are the biggest differences one may overlook? For c# developers that are staring out to learn Java, are there any big underlying differences between the two languages that should be pointed out? Maybe some people may assume things to be the same, but there are some import aspects that shouldn't be overlooked? (or you can really screw up!) Maybe in terms of OOP constructs, the way GC works, references, deployment related, etc.
Does Java have a using statement? Does Java have a using statement that can be used when opening a session in hibernate? In C# it is something like: So the object goes out of scope and closes automatically.
Sending Email in Android using JavaMail API without using the default/built-in app I am trying to create a mail sending application in Android. If I use: This will launch the built-in Android application; I'm trying to send the mail on button click directly without using this application.
When and why JPA entities should implement Serializable interface? The question is in the title. Below I just described some of my thoughts and findings. When I had very simple domain model (3 tables without any relations) all my entities did NOT implement Serializable. But when domain model became more complex I got RuntimeException which said that one of my entities didn't implement Serializable. I use Hibernate as a JPA implementation. I wonder: Is it vendor-specific requirement/behavior? What happens with my serializable entities? Should they be serializable for storing or for transferring? At which moment it becomes necessary to make my entity serializable?
Building a runnable jar with Maven 2 I'm relatively new to the Maven mantra, but I'm trying to build a command-line runnable jar with Maven. I've setup my dependencies, but when I run mvn install and attempt to run the jar, two things happen. First, no main class is found, which is correctable. When I've corrected this, I get errors on run stating that classes cannot be found. Maven is not packaging my dependency libraries inside of the jar, so I am unable to run the jar as a stand-alone application. How do I correct this?
Google Guice vs. PicoContainer for Dependency Injection My team is researching dependency injection frameworks and is trying to decide between using Google-Guice and PicoContainer. We are looking for several things in our framework: A small code footprint - What I mean by a small code footprint is we don't want to have dependency injection code litter everywhere in our code base. If we need to refactor down the road, we want it to be as easy as possible. Performance - How much overhead does each framework have when creating and injecting objects? Ease of use - Is there a large learning curve? Do we have to write mounds of code to get something simple working? We want to have as little configuration as possible. Community size - Larger communities usually means that a project will continue to be maintained. We don't want to use a framework and have to fix our own bugs ;) Also any questions we have along the way can (hopefully) be answered by the framework's developer/user community . Comparisons of the two frameworks against the listed criteria would be greatly appreciated. Any personal experiences that help to compare the two would also be extremely helpful. Disclaimer: I'm fairly new to dependency injection so excuse my noob-ness if I asked a question that isn't pertinent to this discussion.
How to run eclipse in clean mode? and what happens if we do so? If something is not working properly or some plugins are loaded properly in my Eclipse. I often get suggestion to open Eclipse in clean mode. So, how to run in clean mode? and what happens if I do so?
Eclipse - no Java (JRE) / (JDK) ... no virtual machine I am trying to get Eclipse v3.5 (Galileo) to re-run on my computer - I have run it before with no problems, but now I keep getting this error: A Java Runtime Environment (JRE) or Java Development kit (JDK) must be available in order to run Eclipse. No Java virtual machine was found after searching the following locations: C:\eclipse\jre\javaw.exe javaw.exe in your current PATH I've just done a fresh install of both the JDK and the SDK. I have Windows 7 (x64). What's up with this? How do I fix it? I can't run any of the ipconfig / tracert / or ping.
Is java an open source programming language? I know that Python, Ruby, Perl are all open source, but is Java really an open source programming language? I have been searching on Google too, but I didn't find a proper answer.
How do getters and setters work? I'm from the php world. Could you explain what getters and setters are and could give you some examples?
How to configure Eclipse build path to use Maven dependencies? I would like to take advantage of the features that Maven provides for managing dependencies in a project. My brief understanding of how Maven works is that it will aquire the JARs needed and then build the project with these libraries. Currently I have a simple POM file set up as a test: Usually when managing dependencies for a project I would add the project or JAR to the project build path and then be able to build my project.. But when using M2Eclipse the dependencies do are not automatically added to the build path. Is there somewhere I need to configure this to allow Eclipse to know that Maven is managing the dependencies?
How to initialize HashSet values by construction? I need to create a Set with initial values. Is there a way to do this in one command?
calling non-static method in static method in Java I'm getting an error when I try to call a non-static method in a static class. Cannot make a static reference to the non-static method methodName() from the type playback I can't make the method static as this gives me an error too. This static method cannot hide the instance method from xInterface Is there any way to get round calling an non-static method in another static method? (The two methods are in seperate packages and seperate classes).
Is it unnecessary to put super() in constructor? Isn't this one automatically put by the compiler if I don't put it in a subclass's constructor? That means I don't even need to care about it? In some articles they put it out. And if I've got one constructor with arguments, will this be the constructor, or does it take a constructor without argument list?
Recursively list files in Java How do I recursively list all files under a directory in Java? Does the framework provide any utility? I saw a lot of hacky implementations. But none from the framework or nio
Get source JARs from Maven repository Does anyone have any idea if you can find source JARs on Maven repositories?
How can I tell if I'm running in 64-bit JVM or 32-bit JVM (from within a program)? How can I tell if the JVM my application runs in is 32 bit or 64-bit? Specifically, what function or preference do I access to detect this within the program?
How to supply value to an annotation from a Constant java I am thinking this may not be possible in Java because annotation and its parameters are resolved at compile time. I have an interface as follows, and another class as, I mark many classes with the annotation and I would like to know if I can avoid specifying the strings in every annotation I would instead prefer to use However this gives compilation errors like annotation value should be an array initializer etc. Does someone know how I can use a String constant or String[] constant to supply value to an annotation?
Trigger 404 in Spring-MVC controller? How do I get a Spring 3.0 controller to trigger a 404? I have a controller with @RequestMapping(value = "/**", method = RequestMethod.GET) and for some URLs accessing the controller, I want the container to come up with a 404.
Fast Bitmap Blur For Android SDK Currently in an Android application that I'm developing I'm looping through the pixels of an image to blur it. This takes about 30 seconds on a 640x480 image. While browsing apps in the Android Market I came across one that includes a blur feature and their blur is very fast (like 5 seconds) so they must be using a different method of blurring. Anyone know a faster way other than looping through the pixels?
Why is String class declared final in Java? From when I learned that the class java.lang.String is declared as final in Java, I was wondering why is that? I didn't find any answer back then, but this post: How to create a replica of String class in Java? reminded me of my query. Sure, String provides all the functionality I ever needed, and never thought of any operation that would require an extension of class String, but still you'll never know what someone might need! So, does anyone know what was the intent of the designers when they decided to make it final?
Why doesn't Java allow to throw a checked exception from static initialization block? Why doesn't Java allow to throw a checked exception from a static initialization block? What was the reason behind this design decision?
What is the point of the class Option[T]? I am not able to understand the point of Option[T] class in Scala. I mean, I am not able to see any advanages of None over null. For example, consider the code: returns a Person instance or null returns either Some[Person] or None Do nothing Now suppose, the method getPerson1 returns null, then the call made to display on first line of main is bound to fail with NPE. Similarly if getPerson2 returns None, the display call will again fail with some similar error. If so, then why does Scala complicate things by introducing a new value wrapper (Option[T]) instead of following a simple approach used in Java? UPDATE: I have edited my code as per @Mitch's suggestion. I am still not able to see any particular advantage of Option[T]. I have to test for the exceptional null or None in both cases. :( If I have understood correctly from @Michael's reply, is the only advantage of Option[T] is that it explicitly tells the programmer that this method could return None? Is this the only reason behind this design choice?
Importing two classes with same name. How to handle? Say I've a code like: I want to choose my.own.Date here. How? I want to choose util.Date here. How ? Should I be full qualified class names? Can I get rid of the import statements? Is such a scenario common in real world programming?
What is .jspf file extension? How to compile it? What are .jspf files in JSP? As I know the compiler will look for .jsp files to compile, then how are the .jspf files compiled?
Choosing a Java Web Framework now? we are in the planning stage of migrating a large website which is built on a custom developed mvc framework to a java based web framework which provides built-in support for ajax, rich media content, mashup, templates based layout, validation, maximum html/java code separation. Grails looked like a good choice, however, we do not want to use a scripting language. We want to continue using java. Template based layout is a primary concern as we intend to use this web application with multiple web sites with similar functionality but radically different look and feel. Is portal based solution a good fit to this problem? Any insights on using "Spring Roo" or "Play" will be very helpful. I did find similar posts like this, but it is more than a year old. Things have surely changed in the mean time! EDIT 1: Thanks for the great answers! This site is turning to be the best single source for in-the-trenches programmer info. However, I was expecting more info on using a portal-cms duo. Jahia looks goods. Anything similar?
What is the relative performance difference of if/else versus switch statement in Java? Worrying about my web application's performances, I am wondering which of "if/else" or switch statement is better regarding performance?
Byte[] to InputStream or OutputStream I have a blob column in my database table, for which I have to use byte[] in my Java program as a mapping and to use this data I have to convert it to InputStream or OutputStream. But I don't know what happens internally when I do so. Can anyone briefly explain me what's happening when I do this conversion?
What is the difference between "Class.forName()" and "Class.forName().newInstance()"? What is the difference between Class.forName() and Class.forName().newInstance()? I do not understand the significant difference (I have read something about them!). Could you please help me?
What is the difference between JSF, Servlet and JSP? How are JSP and Servlet related to each other? Is JSP some kind of Servlet? How are JSP and JSF related to each other? Is JSF some kind of prebuild UI based JSP like ASP.NET-MVC?
Including jars in classpath on commandline (javac or apt) trying to run this program. I think that to setup all of the web service stuff I need to run apt. (Although using javac I am having the same issue). I think what I am getting is compile errors. (Shown at bottom). I think what I need to do is include this jar in my class path: jsr181-api.jar (source). Is there a simple temporary way to do this (on solaris)? I don't want to add it to my bash_rc file (it is there forever). I also know that there is some way to do it using a manifest text file but that seemed complicated so I didn't look into it yet. Can I just do something like: or Code: javax.jws.WebService @param name @return Say hello to the person. Compile errors: Update: Cool that is wrapped up but it is still not quite working. I have created a new question to keep things nice and organized:
Are there inline functions in java? Is there a concept of inline functions in java, or its replaced something else? If there is, how is it used? I've heard that public, static and final methods are the inline functions. Can we create our own inline function?
Is a Java array of primitives stored in stack or heap? I have an array declaration like this: Here a is an array of primitive int type. Where is this array stored? Is it stored on heap or stack? This is a primitve type int, all primitive types are not stored on heap.
Iterating through a list in reverse order in java I'm migrating a piece of code to make use of generics. One argument for doing so is that the for loop is much cleaner than keeping track of indexes, or using an explicit iterator. In about half the cases, the list (an ArrayList) is being iterated in reverse order by using an index today. Can someone suggest a cleaner way of doing this (since I dislike the indexed for loop when working with collections), though it does work? Note: I can't add any new dependencies outside the JDK.
Listing files in a directory matching a pattern in Java I'm looking for a way to get a list of files that match a pattern (pref regex) in a given directory. I've found a tutorial online that uses apache's commons-io package with the following code: But that just returns a base collection (According to the docs it's a collection of java.io.File). Is there a way to do this that returns a type safe generic collection?
Which is more efficient, a for-each loop, or an iterator? Which is the most efficient way to traverse a collection? or Please note, that this is not an exact duplicate of this, this, this, or this, although one of the answers to the last question comes close. The reason that this is not a dupe, is that most of these are comparing loops where you call get(i) inside the loop, rather than using the iterator. As suggested on Meta I will be posting my answer to this question.
Quickest way to find missing number in an array of numbers I have an array of numbers from 1 to 100 (both inclusive). The size of the array is 100. The numbers are randomly added to the array, but there is one random empty slot in the array. What is the quickest way to find that slot as well as the number that should be put in the slot? A Java solution is preferable.
Questions every good Java/Java EE Developer should be able to answer? I was going through Questions every good .Net developer should be able to answer and was highly impressed with the content and approach of this question, and so in the same spirit, I am asking this question for Java/Java EE Developer. What questions do you think should a good Java/Java EE programmer be able to answer? I am marking this question as community wiki as it is not user specific and it aims to serve programming community at large. Looking forward for some amazing responses. EDIT: Please answer questions too, as suggested in the comments, so that people could learn something new regarding the language, too.
Why java.lang.Object is not abstract? Possible Duplicate: Java: Rationale of the Object class not being declared abstract Why is the Object class, which is base class of 'em all in Java, not abstract? I've had this question for a really really long time and it is asked here purely out of curiosity, that's all. Nothing in my code or anybody's code is breaking because it is not abstract, but I was wondering why they made it concrete? Why would anyone want an "instance" (and not its presence a.k.a. Reference) of this Object class? One case is a poor synchronization code which uses the instance of an Object for locking (at least I used it this way once.. my bad). Is there any practical use of an "instance" of an Object class? And how does its instantiation fit in OOP? What would have happened if they had marked it abstract (of course after providing implementations to its methods)?
How to synchronize a static variable among threads running different instances of a class in java? I know that using the synchronize keyword before a method brings synchronization to that object. That is, 2 threads running the same instance of the object will be synchronized. However, since the synchronization is at the object level, 2 threads running different instances of the object will not be synchronized. So, if we have a static variable in a java class that is called by the method, we would like it to be synchronized across instances of the class. The two instances are running in 2 different threads. Can we achieve synchronization in the following way? Is it true that since we have defined an object 'lock' that is static and we are using the keyword synchronized for that lock, the static varibale count is now synchronized across instances of class Test?
Official reasons for "Software caused connection abort: socket write error" Given this stack trace snippet Caused by: java.net.SocketException: Software caused connection abort: socket write error at java.net.SocketOutputStream.socketWrite0(Native Method) I tried to answer the following questions: What code is throwing this exception? (JVM?/Tomcat?/My code?) What causes this exception to be thrown? Regarding #1: Sun's JVM source doesn't contain this exact message, but I think the text Software caused connection abort: socket write error is from the native implementation of SocketOutputStream: Regarding #2 My guess is that it is caused when the client has terminated the connection, before getting the full response (e.g. sent a request, but before getting the full response, it got closed / terminated / offline) Questions: Are the above assumptions correct (#1 and #2)? Can this be diffrentiated from the situation: "could not write to the client, due to a network error on the server side"? or would that render the same error message? And most important: Is there an official document (e.g from Sun) stating the above? I need to have a proof that this stack trace is the socket client's "fault", and there is nothing that the server could have done to avoid it. (except catching the exception, or using a non Sun JVM SocketOutputStream, though both don't really avoid the fact the client has terminated)
Who is calling the Java Thread interrupt() method if I'm not? I've read and re-read Java Concurrency in Practice, I've read several threads here on the subject, I've read the IBM article Dealing with InterruptedException and yet there's something I'm simply not grasping which I think can be broken down into two questions: If I'm never ever interrupting other threads myself, what can trigger an InterruptedException? If I'm never ever interrupting other threads myself using interrupt() (say because I'm using other means to cancel my working threads, like poison pills and while (!cancelled) style loop [as both explained in JCIP]), what does an InterruptedException then mean? What am I supposed to do upon catching one? Shutdown my app?
Java stack overflow error - how to increase the stack size in Eclipse? I am running a program that I've written in Java in Eclipse. The program has a very deep level of recursion for very large inputs. For smaller inputs the program runs fine however when large inputs are given, I get the following error: Can this be solved by increasing the Java stack size and if so, how do I do this in Eclipse? Update: @Jon Skeet The code is traversing a parse tree recursively in order to build up a datastructure. So, for example the code will do some work using a node in the parse tree and call itself on the node's two children, combining their results to give the overall result for the tree. The total depth of the recursion depends on the size of the parse tree but the code seems to fail (without a larger stack) when the number of recursive calls gets into the 1000s. Also I'm pretty sure the code isn't failing because of a bug as it works for small inputs.
java: how can i do dynamic casting of a variable from one type to another? i would like to do dynamic casting for a java variable, the casting type is stored in a different variable. this is regular casting: this is what i want: is it possible? and if so how? thanks! update I'm trying to populate a class with a hashMap that i received. this is the constructor: <= CASTING PROBLEM the problem here is that some of the classes variables are Double type, and if the number 3 is received it sees it as Integer and i have type problem.
Java heap terminology: young, old and permanent generations? I'm trying to understand how the concepts of young, old and permanent generations in the Java heap terminology, and more specifically the interactions between the three generations. My questions are: What is the young generation? What is the old generation? What is the permanent generation? How does the three generations interact/relate to each other?
java: ArrayList - how can i check if an index exists? I'm using ArrayList<String> and I add data at specific indices, how can I check if a specific index exists? Should I simply get() and check the value? Or should I wait for an exception? Is there another way? Update Thank you for your answers, but because I'm only adding stuff at specific indices, the length of the list will not show me which are available.
Main differences between SOAP and RESTful web services in java Follow up question to this post: For now I have a slight idea about the differences between SOAP and RESTful Services. My question is when I should use SOAP, and when I should use RESTful; which one is "better" when it comes to performance/speed or request handling? I'm implementing for the first time in RESTful(java) and I want know more about it; I've dealt with SOAP before.
@BeforeClass and inheritance - order of execution I have an abstract base class, which I use as a base for my unit tests (TestNG 5.10). In this class, I initialize the whole environment for my tests, setting up database mappings, etc. This abstract class has a method with a @BeforeClass annotation which does the initialization. Next, I extend that class with specific classes in which I have @Test methods and also @BeforeClass methods. These methods do class-specific initialization of the environment (e.g. put some records into the database). How I can enforce a specific order of the @BeforeClass annotated methods? I need the ones from the abstract base class to be executed before the ones of the extending class. Example: Expected order: Actual order: <- crashes, as the base init is missing <---not executed <-/
How do I reverse an int array in Java? I am trying to reverse an int array in Java. This method does not reverse the array. What is wrong with it?
Import PEM into Java Key Store I am trying to connect to an SSL server which requires me to authenticate myself. In order to use SSL over Apache MINA I need a suitable JKS file. However, I have only been given a .PEM file. How would I go about creating a JKS file from a PEM file?
How to cast a double to an int in Java by rounding it down? I need to cast a double to an int in Java, but the numerical value must always round down. i.e. 99.99999999 -> 99
Why does appending "" to a String save memory? I used a variable with a lot of data in it, say String data. I wanted to use a small part of this string in the following way: After some hours of debugging (with a memory visualizer) I found out that the objects field smallpart remembered all the data from data, although it only contained the substring. When I changed the code into: ..the problem was solved! Now my application uses very little memory now! How is that possible? Can anyone explain this? I think this.smallpart kept referencing towards data, but why? UPDATE: How can I clear the big String then? Will data = new String(data.substring(0,100)) do the thing?
How do I set the timeout for a JAX-WS webservice client? I've used JAXWS-RI 2.1 to create an interface for my web service, based on a WSDL. I can interact with the web service no problems, but haven't been able to specify a timeout for sending requests to the web service. If for some reason it does not respond the client just seems to spin it's wheels forever. Hunting around has revealed that I should probably be trying to do something like this: I also discovered that, depending on which version of JAXWS-RI you have, you may need to set these properties instead: The problem I have is that, regardless of which of the above is correct, I don't know where I can do this. All I've got is a Service subclass that implements the auto-generated interface to the webservice and at the point that this is getting instanciated, if the WSDL is non-responsive then it's already too late to set the properties: Can anyone point me in the right direction?!
Get size of folder or file How can I retrieve size of folder or file in Java?
How to set focus on a view when a layout is created and displayed? Currently, I have a layout which contains a Button, a TextView and an EditText. When the layout is displayed, the focus will be automatically put on the EditText, which will trigger the keyboard to show up on Android phone. It is not what I want. Is there any way that I can set the focus on TextView or on nothing when a layout is displayed?
Any shortcut to initialize all array elements to zero? In C/C++ I used to do to initialize all my array elements to 0.Is there a similar shortcut in Java? I want to avoid using the loop, is it possible?
Why does JPA have a @Transient annotation? Java has the transientkeyword. Why does JPA have @Transient instead of simply using the already existing java keyword?
Java: recommended solution for deep cloning/copying an instance I'm wondering if there is a recommended way of doing deep clone/copy of instance in java. I have 3 solutions in mind, but I can have miss some, and I'd like to have your opinion edit: include Bohzo propositon and refine question: it's more about deep cloning than shallow cloning. Do it yourself: code the clone by hand properties after properties and check that mutable instances are cloned too. pro: - control of what will be performed - quick execution cons: - tedious to write and maintain - bug prone (copy/paste failure, missing property, reassigned mutable property) Use reflection: With your own reflection tools or with an external helper (like jakarta common-beans) it is easy to write a generic copy method that will do the job in one line. pro: - easy to write - no maintenance cons: - less control of what happens - bug prone with mutable object if the reflection tool does not clone sub objects too - slower execution Use clone framework: Use a framework that do it for you, like : commons-lang SerializationUtils Java Deep Cloning Library Dozer Kryo pro: - same as reflection - more control over what will be exactly be cloned. cons: - every mutable instance is fully cloned, even at the end of the hierarchy - could be very slow to execute Use bytecode instrumentation to write clone at runtime javassit, BCEL or cglib might be use to generate a dedicated cloner as fast as one hand writed. Someone knows a lib using one of these tools for this purpose ? What I have missed here ? Which one would you recommend ? Thanks.
Paste a multi-line Java String in Eclipse Unfortunately, Java has no syntax for multi-line string literals. No problem if the IDE makes it easy to work with constructs like What is the fastest way to paste a multi-line String from the clipboard into Java source using Eclipse (in a way that it automatically creates code like the above).
Spring 3.0 - Unable to locate Spring NamespaceHandler for XML schema namespace [http://www.springframework.org/schema/security] Any ideas what could be the cause of this? Unable to locate Spring NamespaceHandler for XML schema namespace [http://www.springframework.org/schema/security] This is my applicationContext.xml: In my pom.xml I have:
Where to place and how to read configuration resource files in servlet based application? In my web application I have to send email to set of predefined users like finance@xyz.com, so I wish to add that to a .properties file and access it when required. Is this a correct procedure, if so then where should I place this file? I am using Netbeans IDE which is having two separate folders for source and JSP files.
Eclipse will not open due to environment variables I just rebooted my computer without changing anything. Suddenly I can't open eclipse. Instead, I get this error message: TinyPic image of JRE error dialog http://i46.tinypic.com/34rd4as.gif And I see all my environment variables have been erased. Java, javac, mvn obviously don't work. What do I do now, how do I fix this ? For those unfortunate souls who can't get to tinypic.com from work :-)
How to remove line breaks from a file in Java? How can I replace all line breaks from a string in Java in such a way that will work on Windows and Linux (ie no OS specific problems of carriage return/line feed/new line etc.)? I've tried (note readFileAsString is a function that reads a text file into a String): but this doesn't seem to work. How can this be done?
Is Java really slow? Java has some degree of reputation for being slow. Is Java really slow? If yes, why? Where is (or was) the bottleneck? Is it because of inefficient JVMs? Garbage collection? Pure bytecode libraries instead of JNI-wrapped C code? Many other languages have these features, but they don't have this reputation for slowness.
How do I prevent Spring 3.0 MVC @ModelAttribute variables from appearing in URL? Using Spring MVC 3.0.0.RELEASE, I have the following Controller: setIntakeDate addAttribute add assignIntakeACaseNumber ... Set up command object Validate Intake command object and persist to database ... The Controller reads Intake information from a command object populated from an HTML form, validates the command object, persists the information to the database, and returns a case number. Everything works great, except for when I redirect to the intakeDetails.htm page, I get a URL that looks like this: http://localhost:8080/project/intakeDetails.htm?caseNumber=1&users=user1&users=user2&users=user3&users=user4... How do I prevent the user Collection from showing up in the URL?
Pros and cons of Java rules engines What are the pros and cons to adopting the Java rules engines JESS and Drools? Are there any other players? I understand that Drools is Open Source and JESS is not, but how do they compare in other areas like ease of use, performance, level of integration with your code?
Does Java casting introduce overhead? Why? Is there any overhead when we cast objects of one type to another? Or the compiler just resolves everything and there is no cost at run time? Is this a general things, or there are different cases? For example, suppose we have an array of Object[], where each element might have a different type. But we always know for sure that, say, element 0 is a Double, element 1 is a String. (I know this is a wrong design, but let's just assume I had to do this.) Is Java's type information still kept around at run time? Or everything is forgotten after compilation, and if we do (Double)elements[0], we'll just follow the pointer and interpret those 8 bytes as a double, whatever that is? I'm very unclear about how types are done in Java. If you have any reccommendation on books or article then thanks, too.
How to run all tests belonging to a certain Category in JUnit 4 JUnit 4.8 contains a nice new feature called "Categories" that allows you to group certain kinds of tests together. This is very useful, e.g. to have separate test runs for slow and fast tests. I know the stuff mentioned in JUnit 4.8 release notes, but would like to know how I can actually run all the tests annotated with certain category. The JUnit 4.8 release notes show an example suite definition, where SuiteClasses annotation selects the tests from certain category to run, like this: Note that Categories is a kind of Suite Will run A.b and B.c, but not A.a Does anyone know how I could run all the tests in SlowTests category? It seems that you must have the SuiteClasses annotation...
Calling clojure from java Most of the top google hits for "calling clojure from java" are outdated and recommend using clojure.lang.RT to compile the source code. Could you help with a clear explanation of how to call Clojure from Java assuming you have already built a jar from the Clojure project and included it in the classpath?
Java integer to byte array I got an integer: 1695609641 when I use method: gives: but I want a byte array: How can I make this?
Difference between each instance of servlet and each thread of servlet in servlets? Are there multiple instances of servlet class? As I hear "each instance of servlet" Can anybody elaborate on this?
Java Pass Method as Parameter I am looking for a way to pass a method by reference. I understand that Java does not pass methods as parameters, however, I would like to get an alternative. I've been told interfaces are the alternative to passing methods as parameters but I don't understand how an interface can act as a method by reference. If I understand correctly an interface is simply an abstract set of methods that are not defined. I don't want to send an interface that needs to be defined every time because several different methods could call the same method with the same parameters. What I would like to accomplish is something similar to this: recursive call if Container end if node end looping through components invoked such as:
difference between java.lang.RuntimeException and java.lang.Exception Someone please explain the difference between java.lang.RuntimeException and java.lang.Exception? How do I decide which one to extend if I create my own exception?
What is lazy loading in Hibernate? What is lazy loading in Java? I don't understand the process. Can anybody help me to understand the process of lazy loading?
How to import a class from default package Possible Duplicate: How to access java-classes in the default-package? I am using Eclipse 3.5 and I have created a project with some package structure along with the default package. I have one class in default package - Calculations.java and I want to make the use of that class in any of the package (for instance in com.company.calc). When I try to make the use of the class which is in the default package, it's giving me a compiler error. It's not able to recognise the class in default package. Where is the problem? Calculations.java - source code loadLibrary I can't put my class in any other package. This class has some native methods which are implemented in Delphi. If I put that class in any of the folders, I will have to make changes to that DLL which I want to avoid (really - I can not). That's why I put my class in the default package.
How many spaces will Java String.trim() remove? In Java, I have a String like this: Will String.trim() remove all spaces on these sides or just one space on each?
Combinatoric 'N choose R' in java math? Is there a built in method in a java library that can compute 'N choose R' for any N, R?
Converting ISO 8601-compliant String to java.util.Date I am trying to convert an ISO 8601 formatted String to a java.util.Date. I found the pattern "yyyy-MM-dd'T'HH:mm:ssZ" to be ISO8601-compliant if used with a Locale (compare sample). However, using the java.text.SimpleDateFormat, I cannot convert the correctly formatted String "2010-01-01T12:00:00+01:00". I have to convert it first to "2010-01-01T12:00:00+0100", without the colon. So, the current solution is which obviously isn't that nice. Am I missing something or is there a better solution? answer Thanks to JuanZe's comment, I found the Joda-Time magic, it is also described here. So, the solution is Or more simply, use the default parser via the constructor: To me, this is nice.
How to split a string, but also keep the delimiters? I have a multiline string which is delimited by a set of different delimiters: I can split this string into its parts, using String.split, but it seems that I can't get the actual string, which matched the delimiter regex. In other words, this is what I get: Text1 Text2 Text3 Text4 This is what I want Text1 DelimiterA Text2 DelimiterC Text3 DelimiterB Text4 Is there any JDK way to split the string using a delimiter regex but also keep the delimiters?
Why is no one using make for Java? Just about every Java project that I've seen either uses Maven or Ant. They are fine tools and I think just about any project can use them. But what ever happened to make? It's used for a variety of non-Java projects and can easily handle Java. Sure you have to download make.exe if you use Windows, but Ant and Maven also don't come with the JDK. Is there some fundamental flaw with make when used with Java? Is it just because Ant and Maven are written in Java?
Why not abstract fields? Why can't Java classes have abstract fields like they can have abstract methods? For example: I have two classes that extend the same abstract base class. These two classes each have a method that is identical except for a String constant, which happens to be an error message, within them. If fields could be abstract, I could make this constant abstract and pull the method up into the base class. Instead, I have to create an abstract method, called getErrMsg() in this case, that returns the String, override this method in the two derived classes, and then I can pull up the method (which now calls the abstract method). Why couldn't I just make the field abstract to begin with? Could Java have been designed to allow this?
What is Daemon thread in Java? Can anybody tell me what daemon threads are in Java?
Converting Hibernate proxy to real object During Hibernate session I am loading some objects and some of them are loaded as proxies due to lazy loading. It's all OK and I don't want to turn lazy loading off. But later I need to send some of the objects (actually one object) to the GWT client via RPC. And it happens that this concrete object is a proxy. So I need to turn it to real object. I can't find a method like "materialize" in Hibernate. How can I turn some of the objects from proxies to reals knowing their class and ID? At the moment the only solution I see is to evict that object from Hibernate's cache and reload it, but it is really bad for many reasons.
Get unicode value of a character Is there any way in Java so that I can get Unicode equivalent of any character? e.g. Suppose a method getUnicode(char c). A call getUnicode('') should return \u00f7.
How do I make my string comparison case insensitive? I created a Java program to compare two strings: It displays "welcome". I understand it is case sensitive. But my problem is that I want to compare two strings without case sensitivity. I.e. I expect the output to be hai.
Why doesn't "System.out.println" work in Android? I want to print something in console, so that I can debug it. But for some reason, nothing prints in my Android application. How do I debug then? Called when the activity is first created.
HttpServletRequest to complete URL I have an HttpServletRequest object. How do I get the complete and exact URL that caused this call to arrive at my servlet? Or at least as accurately as possible, as there are perhaps things that can be regenerated (the order of the parameters, perhaps).
maven build failed: Unable to locate the Javac Compiler in: jre or jdk issue I have my JAVA_HOME set to After I run maven install I get this message from eclipse: Reason: I'm certain that this is the tricky part Please ensure you are using JDK 1.4 or above and not a JRE When I run configuration its set to JRE6, how do I change it to JDK 1.6 which I have already installed EDIT I even tried to modify the plugin : Still I get the same error Maybe I forgot to say I use eclipse maven plugin .. how can I change from JRE to JDK in eclipse ?
Why doesn't Java allow overriding of static methods? Why is it not possible to override static methods? If possible, please use an example.
Closing Database Connections in Java I am getting a little confused, I was reading the below from http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Java_Database_Connectivity It's important to close the statement when you are done with it Do you not need to close the conn Connection? What is really happening if the conn.close() doesn't occur? I have a private web app I'm maintaining that doesn't currently close either form, but is the important one really the stmt one, the conn one, or both? The site keeps going down intermittently but the server keeps saying it's a database connection issue, my suspicion is that it's not being closed, but I don't know which if any to close.
ERROR: JDWP Unable to get JNI 1.2 environment I get this error after debugging in Eclipse. The debug is successful though. What does it mean?
How to get Latitude and Longitude of the mobile device in android? How do I get the current Latitude and Longitude of the mobile device in android using location tools?
Maven: add a dependency to a jar by relative path I have a proprietary jar that I want to add to my pom as a dependency. But I don't want to add it to a repository. The reason is that I want my usual maven commands such as mvn compile, etc, to work out of the box. (Without demanding from the developers a to add it to some repository by themselves). I want the jar to be in a 3rdparty lib in source control, and link to it by relative path from the pom.xml file. Can this be done? How?
How to check for a valid URL in Java? What is the best way to check if a URL is valid in Java? If tried to call new URL(urlString) and catch a MalformedURLException, but it seems to be happy with anything that begins with http://. I'm not concerned about establishing a connection, just validity. Is there a method for this? An annotation in Hibernate Validator? Should I use a regex? Edit: Some examples of accepted URLs are http://*** and http://my favorite site!.
When is a Java method name too long? In the last weeks I've seen some guys using really long names for a Method or Class (50 characters), this is usually under the premise that it improves readability, my opinion is that a long name like this is an indicator that we are trying to do a lot or too much in a method class if we need such a long name, however I wanted to know what do you guys think about it. An Example is:
How to change highlighted occurrences color in Eclipse's sidebar? When you have "Mark occurrences" enabled in Eclipse, placing the cursor on any type/variable/method/etc will highlight all occurrences in the text editor and place a faint bar in the right ruler to show you the location of other occurrences in the file. Does anyone know where in the Preferences you can change what color is used to highlight the other occurrences in the side ruler? The color is way too faint for me with my current monitor/Windows Aero theme. I tried to go into Preferences > General > Appearance > Color and Fonts change the color for "Color labels - match highlight" but this didn't seem to apply. Here is a screenshot with what I am talking about:
Scanner vs. BufferedReader As far I know, the two most common methods of reading character-based data from a file in Java is using Scanner or BufferedReader. I also know that the BufferedReader read files efficiently by using a buffer to avoid physical disk operations. My questions are: Does Scanner performs as well as BufferedReader? Why would you choose Scanner over BufferedReader or vice versa?
What is the purpose of Serialization in Java? I have read quite a number of articles on Serialization and how it is so nice and great but none of the arguments were convincing enough. I am wondering if someone can really tell me what is it that we can really achieve by serializing a class?
Where can I view Tomcat log files in Eclipse? Where can I view Tomcat log files in Eclipse? For some reason my Tomcat installation/log folder is always empty. BTW, does Tomcat dump to the log file after a while or is it immediate?
final keyword in method parameters I often encounter methods which look like the following: What happens if this method is called without passing it final parameters. i.e. an Object1 that is later changed (so is not declared as final) can be passed to this method just fine
Java Naming Convention with Acronyms What is the correct name for the following Java class: DVDPlayer or DvdPlayer?
Which maven dependencies to include for spring 3.0? I am trying to do my first project with Spring 3.0 (and maven). I have been using Spring 2.5 (and primer versions) in quite some projects. Nevertheless I am kinda confused, what modules I have to define as dependencies in my pom.xml. I just want to use the core container functions (beans, core, context, el). I was used to do this: But now I am kinda confused, as there is no full packed spring module for version 3.0 anymore. I tried the following but it didnt work (some classes are missing). Any help would be appreciated!
Can I obtain method parameter name using Java reflection? If I have a class like this: is there any way to know that aMethod uses a parameter named aParam, that is of type int?
Java thread affinity Does anybody know of a way to lock down individual threads within a Java process to specific CPU cores (on Linux)? I've done this in C, but can't find how to do this in Java. My instincts are that this will require a JNI call, but I was hoping someone here might have some insight or might have done it before. Thanks!
Java clearing the string buffer after loop How do you clear the string buffer in Java after a loop so the next iteration uses a clear string buffer?
How to implement pagination in Spring MVC 3 Is there any out-of-the-box, easy to implement, standard pagination component/tag-lib or code-sample available for pagination in Spring MVC?
NoClassDefFoundError - Eclipse and Android I'm having a problem trying to run an Android app which, up until adding a second external library to its build path, was working fine. Since having added the scoreninja jar, I now get a NoClassDefFoundError when I try to run the app. Here's the message: As all of the build scripts are generated by the Android tools (?), I'm not sure what else I can do other than cleaning and rebuilding or restarting eclipse (I have already tried all three). Does anyone know how I can amend this?
Handling exceptions from Java ExecutorService tasks I'm trying to use Java's ThreadPoolExecutor class to run a large number of heavy weight tasks with a fixed number of threads. Each of the tasks has many places during which it may fail due to exceptions. I've subclassed ThreadPoolExecutor and I've overridden the afterExecute method which is supposed to provide any uncaught exceptions encountered while running a task. However, I can't seem to make it work. For example: println submit shutdown core threads max threads timeout timeout units work queue The output from this program is "Everything's fine--situation normal!" even though the only Runnable submitted to the thread pool throws an exception. Any clue to what's going on here? Thanks!
Spring MVC vs JSF I haved used Struts framework in all my past applications and for the new application,my client has requested to use either Spring MVC or JSF? I am not familiar with these two frameworks but our timelines are strict. So, I am not sure which framework I will choose to build the application. Can anyone please suggest me which framework will be easy to learn in quick time? Thanks
Null check in an enhanced for loop What is the best way to guard against null in a for loop in Java? This seems ugly : do whatever Or Or throw ex do whatever There might not be any other way. Should they have put it in the for construct itself, if it is null then don't run the loop?
Compare two JSON objects in Java I'm looking for a JSON parsing library that supports comparing two JSON objects ignoring child order, specifically for unit testing JSON returning from a web service. Do any of the major JSON libraries support this? The org.json library simply does a reference comparison.
Java G1 garbage collection in production Since Java 7 is going to use the new G1 garbage collection by default is Java going to be able to handle an order of magnitude larger heap without supposed "devastating" GC pause times? Has anybody actually implemented G1 in production, what were your experiences? To be fair the only time I have seen really long GC pauses is on very large heaps, much more than a workstation would have. To clarify my question; will G1 open the gateway to heaps in the hundreds of GB? TB?
Can an int be null in Java? Can an int be null in Java? For example: do something do something My goal is to write a function which returns an int. Said int is stored in the height of a node, and if the node is not present, it will be null, and I'll need to check that. I am doing this for homework but this specific part is not part of the homework, it just helps me get through what I am doing. Thanks for the comments, but it seems very few people have actually read what's under the code, I was asking how else I can accomplish this goal; it was easy to figure out that it doesn't work.
Can I multiply strings in Java to repeat sequences? I have something like the following: I'd like to append i "0"s to the someNum string. Does it have some way I can multiply a string to repeat it like Python does? So I could just go: or something similar? Where, in this case, my final result would be: "123000".
java: run a function after a specific number of seconds I have a specific function that I want to be executed after 5 seconds. How can i do that in Java? I found javax.swing.timer, but I can't really understand how to use it. It looks like I'm looking for something way simpler then this class provides. Please add a simple usage example.
Why do I need to override the equals and hashCode methods in Java? Recently I read through this Developer Works Document. The document is all about defining hashCode() and equals() effectively and correctly, but I am not able to figure out why we need to override these two methods. How can I take the decision to implement these method efficiently?
When to use Comparable and Comparator I have a list of objects I need to sort on a field, say Score. Without giving much thought I wrote a new class that implements Comparator, that does the task and it works. Now looking back at this, I am wondering if I should have instead have the my class implement Comparable instead of creating a new class that implements Comparator. The score is the only field that the objects will be ordered on. What I have done acceptable as a practice? Is the right approach "First have the class implement Comparable (for the natural ordering) and if an alternative field comparison is required, then create a new class that implements Comparator" ? If (2) above is true, then does it mean that one should implement Comparator only after they have the class implement Comparable? (Assuming I own the original class).
Getting all the enum values from enum value I came across this problem that I without knowing the actual enum type I need to iterate its possible values. Any ideas how to extract from enumValue its possible values ? Thanks
String isNullOrEmpty in Java? This surely has been asked before, but Googling doesn't find it. Is there, in any of the standard java libraries (including apache/google/...), a static isNullOrEmpty() method for Strings?
In Java, how do I check if a string contains a substring (ignoring case)? I have two Strings, str1 and str2. How do I check if str2 is contained within str1, ignoring case?
How to timeout a thread I want to run a thread for some fixed amount of time. If it is not completed within that time, I want to either kill it, throw some exception, or handle it in some way. How can it be done? One way of doing it as I figured out from this thread is to use a TimerTask inside the run() method of the Thread. Are there any better solutions for this? EDIT: Adding a bounty as I needed a clearer answer. The ExecutorService code given below does not address my problem. Why should I sleep() after executing (some code - I have no handle over this piece of code)? If the code is completed and the sleep() is interrupted, how can that be a timeOut? The task that needs to be executed is not in my control. It can be any piece of code. The problem is this piece of code might run into an infinite loop. I don't want that to happen. So, I just want to run that task in a separate thread. The parent thread has to wait till that thread finishes and needs to know the status of the task (i.e whether it timed out or some exception occured or if its a success). If the task goes into an infinite loop, my parent thread keeps on waiting indefinitely, which is not an ideal situation.
How to make mock to void methods with mockito How to mock methods with void return type? I implemented an Observer pattern but I can't mock it with Mockito because I don't know how. And I tried to find an example on the Internet, but didn't succeed. My class looks like setter getter state The system are not triggered with mock. =( I want to show above mentioned system state. And make assertion according to them.
Type List vs type ArrayList in Java I understand that with (1), implementations of the List interface can be swapped. It seems that (1) is typically used in an application regardless of need (myself I always use this). I am wondering if anyone uses (2)? Also, how often (and can I please get an example) does the situation actually require using (1) over (2) (i.e. where (2) wouldn't suffice..aside coding to interfaces and best practices etc.)
Named placeholders in string formatting In Python, when formatting string, I can fill placeholders by name rather than by position, like that: I wonder if that is possible in Java (hopefully, without external libraries)? Thanks in advance.
What does it mean: The serializable class does not declare a static final serialVersionUID field? I have the warning message given in the title. I would like to understand and remove it. I found already some answers on this question but I do not understand these answers because of an overload with technical terms. Is it possible to explain this issue with simple words? P.S. I know what OOP is. I know what is object, class, method, field and instantiation. P.P.S. If somebody needs my code it is here: setTitle setBorder setText createEmptyBorder invokeLater java.awt add setDefaultCloseOperation createAndViewJFrame setVisible pack setLayout javax.swing getContentPane ====================================================== constructor ... Set initial text, scrolling, and border. Get the content pane, set layout, add to center ============================================================= main
How to generate a random BigInteger value in Java? I need to generate arbitrarily large random integers in the range 0 (inclusive) to n (exclusive). My initial thought was to call nextDouble and multiply by n, but once n gets to be larger than 253, the results would no longer be uniformly distributed. BigInteger has the following constructor available: Constructs a randomly generated BigInteger, uniformly distributed over the range 0 to (2numBits - 1), inclusive. How can this be used to get a random value in the range 0 - n, where n is not a power of 2?
log4j not printing the stacktrace for exceptions I am using log4j with tomcat. When I log exceptions in my JSPs, servlets: I only get the first line of the exception, without a stacktrace. 17-Feb 17:37:45 ERROR AutoContrib:175 - Exception while publishing csv file: java.lang.ArrayIndexOutOfBoundsException Not very helpful at all! My log4j.properties file (/tomcat/common/classes/log4j.properties) looks like this:
How do I discover memory usage of my application in Android? How can I find the memory used on my Android application, programmatically? I hope there is a way to do it. Plus, how do I get the free memory of the phone too?
object references an unsaved transient instance - save the transient instance before flushing I receive following error when I save the object using Hibernate object references an unsaved transient instance - save the transient instance before flushing
java.util.Date vs java.sql.Date java.util.Date vs java.sql.Date: when to use which and why?
Java Desktop application: SWT vs. Swing I'm a web developer at day and thinking about building my first real desktop application. The idea is to build a tool that automates a very repetitive task in a web application where no API is available. I know I want to use Java. I used it before for web stuff, know the syntax pretty well and want the application to be cross plattform as easy as possible. Where I'm not so sure is if I should use SWT or Swing. As my main audience uses Windows, I want to look it as native as possible there. Linux and Mac should work, but the looks are not so important here. So what are the arguments for and against each UI Framework, Swing or SWT? Thanks. PS: I develop on Windows using Eclipse. But was thinking about playing with Netbeans.
getResourceAsStream() vs FileInputStream I was trying to load a file in a webapp, and I was getting a FileNotFound exception when I used FileInputStream. However, using the same path, I was able to load the file when I did getResourceAsStream(). What is the difference between the two methods, and why does one work while the other doesn't?
How to fix java.net.SocketException: Broken pipe? I am using apache commons http client to call url using post method to post the parameters and it is throwing the below error rarely. Can someone suggest what is causing this Exception and how to debug it?
Why doesn't String's hashCode() cache 0? I noticed in the Java 6 source code for String that hashCode only caches values other than 0. The difference in performance is exhibited by the following snippet: currentTimeMillis toUpperCase hashCode test format Running this in ideone.com gives the following output: So my questions are: Why doesn't String's hashCode() cache 0? What is the probability that a Java string hashes to 0? What's the best way to avoid the performance penalty of recomputing the hash value every time for strings that hash to 0? Is this the best-practice way of caching values? (i.e. cache all except one?) For your amusement, each line here is a string that hash to 0:
How to read a specific line using the specific line number from a file in Java? In Java, is there any method to read a particular line from a file? For example, read line 32 or any other line number.
JUnit 4 compare Collections How would you succinctly assert the equality of collections elements, specifically a Set in JUnit 4?
Most concise way to convert a Set to a List I am currently doing this: Can you beat this ?
Eclipse copy/paste entire line keyboard shortcut Anyone know the keyboard shortcut to copy/paste a line into a new line in Eclipse, without having to highlight the entire line? ctrl-alt-down turns my whole screen upside down (I'm on windows). Interestingly, that's what's specified in the windows->preferences.
Why doesn't Java have compound assignment versions of the conditional-and and conditional-or operators? (&&=, ||=) So for binary operators on booleans, Java has &, |, ^, && and ||. Let's summarize what they do briefly here: JLS 15.22.2 Boolean Logical Operators &, ^, and | JLS 15.23 Conditional-And Operator && JLS 15.24 Conditional-Or Operator || For &, the result value is true if both operand values are true; otherwise, the result is false. For |, the result value is false if both operand values are false; otherwise, the result is true. For ^, the result value is true if the operand values are different; otherwise, the result is false. The && operator is like & but evaluates its right-hand operand only if the value of its left-hand operand is true. The || operator is like |, but evaluates its right-hand operand only if the value of its left-hand operand is false. Now, among all 5, 3 of those have compound assignment versions, namely |=, &= and ^=. So my question is obvious: why doesn't Java provide &&= and ||= as well? I find that I need those more than I need &= and |=. And I don't think that "because it's too long" is a good answer, because Java has >>>=. There must be a better reason for this omission. From 15.26 Assignment Operators: There are 12 assignment operators; [...] = *= /= %= += -= <<= >>= >>>= &= ^= |= A comment was made that if &&= and ||= were implemented, then it would be the only operators that do not evaluate the right hand side first. I believe this notion that a compound assignment operator evaluates the right hand side first is a mistake. From 15.26.2 Compound Assignment Operators: A compound assignment expression of the form E1 op= E2 is equivalent to E1 = (T)((E1) op (E2)), where T is the type of E1, except that E1 is evaluated only once. As proof, the following snippet throws a NullPointerException, not an ArrayIndexOutOfBoundsException.
What is the shortest way to pretty print a org.w3c.dom.Document to stdout? What is the easiest way to pretty print (a.k.a. formatted) a org.w3c.dom.Document to stdout?
How to properly override clone method? I need to implement a deep clone in one of my objects which has no superclass. What is the best way to handle the checked CloneNotSupportedException thrown by the superclass (which is Object)? A coworker advised me to handle it the following way: Deep clone member fields here This seems like a good solution to me, but I wanted to throw it out to the StackOverflow community to see if there are any other insights I can include. Thanks!
Oracle JDBC intermittent Connection Issue I am experiencing a very strange problem This is a very simple use of JDBC connecting to an Oracle database When I make use of the jar file OJDBC14.jar it connects to the database everytime When I make use of the jar file OJDBC5.jar it connects some times and other times it throws an error ( shown below) If I recompile with Java 6 and use OJDBC6.jar I get the same results as OJDBC5.jar I need specific features in JODB5.jar that are not available in OJDBC14.jar Any ideas Error Code Below is the code I am using forName println close java.sql java.io getConnection printStackTrace
Java variable number or arguments for a method It is possible to declare a method that will allow a variable number of parameters? What is the symbolism used in the definition that indicate that the method should allow a variable number of parameters? Answer: varargs
No tests found with test runner 'JUnit 4' My Java test worked well from Eclipse. But now, when I relaunch test from the run menu, I get the following message: In the .classpath file I have all jar files, and at the end have: How can I resolve this error and get tests running again?
Java: Multiple class declarations in one file In Java, you can define multiple top level classes in a single file, providing that at most one of these is public (see JLS 7.6). See below for example. Is there a tidy name for this technique (analogous to inner, nested, anonymous)? The JLS says the system may enforce the restriction that these secondary classes can't be referred to by code in other compilation units of the package, e.g., they can't be treated as package-private. Is that really something that changes between Java implementations? e.g., PublicClass.java:
Managing highly repetitive code and documentation in Java Highly repetitive code is generally a bad thing, and there are design patterns that can help minimize this. However, sometimes it's simply inevitable due to the constraints of the language itself. Take the following example from java.util.Arrays: Assigns the specified long value to each element of the specified range of the specified array of longs. The range to be filled extends from index <tt>fromIndex</tt>, inclusive, to index <tt>toIndex</tt>, exclusive. (If <tt>fromIndex==toIndex</tt>, the range to be filled is empty.) @param a the array to be filled @param fromIndex the index of the first element (inclusive) to be filled with the specified value @param toIndex the index of the last element (exclusive) to be filled with the specified value @param val the value to be stored in all elements of the array @throws IllegalArgumentException if <tt>fromIndex &gt; toIndex</tt> @throws ArrayIndexOutOfBoundsException if <tt>fromIndex &lt; 0</tt> or <tt>toIndex &gt; a.length</tt> The above snippet appears in the source code 8 times, with very little variation in the documentation/method signature but exactly the same method body, one for each of the root array types int[], short[], char[], byte[], boolean[], double[], float[], and Object[]. I believe that unless one resorts to reflection (which is an entirely different subject in itself), this repetition is inevitable. I understand that as a utility class, such high concentration of repetitive Java code is highly atypical, but even with the best practice, repetition does happen! Refactoring doesn't always work because it's not always possible (the obvious case is when the repetition is in the documentation). Obviously maintaining this source code is a nightmare. A slight typo in the documentation, or a minor bug in the implementation, is multiplied by however many repetitions was made. In fact, the best example happens to involve this exact class: Google Research Blog - Extra, Extra - Read All About It: Nearly All Binary Searches and Mergesorts are Broken (by Joshua Bloch, Software Engineer) The bug is a surprisingly subtle one, occurring in what many thought to be just a simple and straightforward algorithm. int mid =(low + high) / 2; the bug the fix The above line appears 11 times in the source code! So my questions are: How are these kinds of repetitive Java code/documentation handled in practice? How are they developed, maintained, and tested? Do you start with "the original", and make it as mature as possible, and then copy and paste as necessary and hope you didn't make a mistake? And if you did make a mistake in the original, then just fix it everywhere, unless you're comfortable with deleting the copies and repeating the whole replication process? And you apply this same process for the testing code as well? Would Java benefit from some sort of limited-use source code preprocessing for this kind of thing? Perhaps Sun has their own preprocessor to help write, maintain, document and test these kind of repetitive library code? A comment requested another example, so I pulled this one from Google Collections: com.google.common.base.Predicates lines 276-310 (AndPredicate) vs lines 312-346 (OrPredicate). The source for these two classes are identical, except for: AndPredicate vs OrPredicate (each appears 5 times in its class) "And(" vs Or(" (in the respective toString() methods) #and vs #or (in the @see Javadoc comments) true vs false (in apply; ! can be rewritten out of the expression) -1 /* all bits on */ vs 0 /* all bits off */ in hashCode() &= vs |= in hashCode()
As a Java programmer learning Python, what should I look out for? Much of my programming background is in Java, and I'm still doing most of my programming in Java. However, I'm starting to learn Python for some side projects at work, and I'd like to learn it as independent of my Java background as possible - i.e. I don't want to just program Java in Python. What are some things I should look out for? A quick example - when looking through the Python tutorial, I came across the fact that defaulted mutable parameters of a function (such as a list) are persisted (remembered from call to call). This was counter-intuitive to me as a Java programmer and hard to get my head around. (See here and here if you don't understand the example.) Someone also provided me with this list, which I found helpful, but short. Anyone have any other examples of how a Java programmer might tend to misuse Python...? Or things a Java programmer would falsely assume or have trouble understanding? Edit: Ok, a brief overview of the reasons addressed by the article I linked to to prevent duplicates in the answers (as suggested by Bill the Lizard). (Please let me know if I make a mistake in phrasing, I've only just started with Python so I may not understand all the concepts fully. And a disclaimer - these are going to be very brief, so if you don't understand what it's getting at check out the link.) A static method in Java does not translate to a Python classmethod A switch statement in Java translates to a hash table in Python Don't use XML Getters and setters are evil (hey, I'm just quoting :) ) Code duplication is often a necessary evil in Java (e.g. method overloading), but not in Python (And if you find this question at all interesting, check out the link anyway. :) It's quite good.)
What is the purpose of flush() in Java streams? In Java, flush() method is used in streams. But I don't understand what are all the purpose of using this method? tell me some suggestions.
Difference between logger.info and logger.debug What is the difference between logger.debug and logger.info ? When will logger.debug be printed?
Java equivalent to #region in c# I want to use regions for code folding in Eclipse; how can that be done in Java? An example usage in C#: code
doGet and doPost in Servlets I've developed an HTML page that sends information to a Servlet. In the Servlet, I am using the methods doGet() and doPost(): In the html page code that calls the Servlet is: When I use method = "get" in the Servlet, I get the value of id and password, however when using method = "post", id and password are set to null. Why don't I get the values in this case? Another thing I'd like to know is how to use the data generated or validated by the Servlet. For example, if the Servlet shown above authenticates the user, I'd like to print the user id in my HTML page. I should be able to send the string 'id' as a response and use this info in my HTML page. Is it possible?
Stateless and Stateful Enterprise Java Beans I am going through the Java EE 6 tutorial and I am trying to understand the difference between stateless and stateful session beans. If stateless session beans do not retain their state in between method calls, why is my program acting the way it is? javax.ejb.LocalBean javax.ejb.Stateless The client println javax.servlet.http java.io.IOException java.io.PrintWriter javax.servlet.annotation.WebServlet mybeans.MyBean getNumber getWriter javax.ejb.EJB increment javax.servlet I was expecting getNumber to return 0 every time but it is returning 1 and reloads of the servlet in my browser increase it more. The problem is with my understanding of how stateless session beans work and not with the libraries or application server, of course. Can somebody give me a simple hello world type example of a stateless session bean that behaves differently when you change it to stateful?
initializing a boolean array in java I have this code could someone tell me what exactly i'm doing wrong here and how would i correct it? I just need to initialize all the array elements to Boolean false. thank you
How to extract numbers from a string and get an array of ints? I have a String variable (basically an English sentence with an unspecified number of numbers) and I'd like to extract all the numbers into an array of integers. I was wondering whether there was a quick solution with regular expressions? I used Sean's solution and changed it slightly:
What is the ellipsis (...) for in this method signature? In the App Engine docs, what is the ellipsis (JID...) for in this method signature? What's the function of those three dots?
object==null or null==object? I heard from somebody that null == object is better than object == null check eg : Is this better than object == null ? Why ? Else blah blah Is there any reasons or this is another myth ? Thanks for help.
how we check for null array in java I am new bie to java unable to check for null. can you enlighten me on this. I have int array which has no elements I tried this code but this condition always stay false and nerver prints "k.length"
Is there any sizeof-like method in Java? Is there any built-in method in Java to find the size of any datatype? Is there any way to find size?
Java SimpleDateFormat for time zone with a colon separator? I have a date in the following format: 2010-03-01T00:00:00-08:00 I have thrown the following SimpleDateFormats at it to parse it: ISO8601 long RFC822 zone ISO8601 long long form zone ignore timezone ISO8601 short birthdate from NIST IHE C32 sample just the year I have a convenience method that uses those formats like so: It seems to hit on the pattern yyyyMMddHHmm but returns the date as Thu Dec 03 00:01:00 PST 2009. What is the correct pattern to parse this date? UPDATE: I don't NEED the time zone parsing. I don't anticipate having time sensitive issues moving between zones, but how would I get the "-08:00" zone format to parse???? Unit test: month is zero based, are you effing kidding me my machine happens to be in GMT-0800 Output from unit test:
Converting to upper and lower case in Java I want to convert the first character of a string to Uppercase and the rest of the characters to lowercase. How can I do it? Example:
Custom fonts and XML layouts (Android) I'm trying to define a GUI layout using XML files in Android. As far as I can find out, there is no way to specify that your widgets should use a custom font (e.g. one you've placed in assets/font/) in XML files and you can only use the system installed fonts. I know that, in the Java code, I could change the font of each widget manually using unique IDs. Alternatively, I could iterate over all the widgets in Java to make this change, but this would probably be very slow. What other options do I have? Is there any better ways to making widgets that have a custom look? I don't particularly want to have to manually change the font for every new widget I add.
Jackson Vs. Gson After searching through some existing libraries for JSON, I have finally ended up with these two: Jackson Google GSon I am a bit partial towards GSON, but word on the net is that GSon suffers from a certain celestial performance issue (as of Sept 2009). I am continuing my comparison; in the meantime, I'm looking for help to make up my mind.
How to mark logical sections of code in Java comments? Java classes are generally divided into logical "blocks". Is there a convention to mark these sections? Ideally, it would be supported by the major IDEs. I personally use this method: Section name here However, some editors seem to have problems with this. As an example, in Objective-C code you can use this method: This will result in a menu in XCode that looks like this:
Java Currency Number format Is there a way to format a decimal as following: If it is a round number, omit the decimal part. Otherwise format with two decimal places.
How can I get the SQL of a PreparedStatement? I have a general Java method with the following method signature: It opens a connection, builds a PreparedStatement using the sql statement and the parameters in the queryParams variable length array, runs it, caches the ResultSet (in a CachedRowSetImpl), closes the connection, and returns the cached result set. I have exception handling in the method that logs errors. I log the sql statement as part of the log since it's very helpful for debugging. My problem is that logging the String variable sql logs the template statement with ?'s instead of actual values. I want to log the actual statement that was executed (or tried to execute). So... Is there any way to get the actual SQL statement that will be run by a PreparedStatement? (Without building it myself. If I can't find a way to access the PreparedStatement's SQL, I'll probably end up building it myself in my catches.)
Convert 4 bytes to int I'm reading a binary file like this: ??? What I want to do it to read up to 4 bytes and create a int value from those but, I don't know how to do it. I kind of feel like I have to grab 4 bytes at a time, and perform one "byte" operation ( like >> << >> & FF and stuff like that ) to create the new int What's the idiom for this? EDIT Ooops this turn out to be a bit more complex ( to explain ) What I'm trying to do is, read a file ( may be ascii, binary, it doesn't matter ) and extract the integers it may have. For instance suppose the binary content ( in base 2 ) : The integer representation should be 1 , 2 right? :- / 1 for the first 32 bits, and 2 for the remaining 32 bits. Would be -1 and Would be Integer.MAX_VALUE ( 2147483647 )
Android Layout with ListView and Buttons Alright, this specific layout is just annoying me. And can't seem to find a way to have a listView, with a row of buttons at the bottom so that the listview doesn't extend over top of the buttons, and so the buttons are always snapped to the bottom of the screen. Here's what I want: removed dead ImageShack link It seems like it should be so easy, but everything I've tried has failed. Any help? Here's my current code: Add LinearLayout with button(s) Add ListView
How do I crop an image in Java? I want to crop an image manually using the mouse. Suppose the image has some text, and I want to select some text from an image, then for that purpose I want to crop that area by using the mouse.
What does 'public static void' mean in Java? What does public static void mean in Java? I'm in the process of learning. In all the examples in the book I'm working from public static void comes before any method that is being used or created. What does this mean?
How to set selected item of Spinner by value, not by position? I have a update view, where I need to preselect the value stored in database for a Spinner. I was having in mind something like this, but the Adapter has no indexOf method, so I am stuck.
Java: how do I get a class literal from a generic type? Typically, I've seen people use the class literal like this: But what if the type is generic, e.g. List? This works fine, but has a warning since List should be parameterized: So why not add a <?>? Well, this causes a type mismatch error: I figured something like this would work, but this is just a plain ol' a syntax error: How can I get a Class<List<Foo>> statically, e.g. using the class literal? I could use @SuppressWarnings("unchecked") to get rid of the warnings caused by the non-parameterized use of List in the first example, Class<List> cls = List.class, but I'd rather not. Any suggestions?
What is a classpath? I was just reading this line: The first thing the format() method does is load a Velocity template from the classpath named output.vm And I couldn't figure out what was meant by classpath in this context.
Java - JDBC alternatives this is just theoretical question. I use JDBC with my Java applications for using database (select, insert, update, delete or whatever). I make "manually" Java classes which will contain data from DB tables (attribute = db column). Then I make queries (ResultSet) and fill those classes with data. I am not sure, if this is the right way. But I've read lot of about JDO and another persistence solutions. Can someone please recommend the best used JDBC alternatives, based on their experience? I would also like to know the advantages of JDO over JDBC (in simple words). I've been able to google lot of this stuff, but opinions from the "first hand" are always best. Thanks
Difference between Inheritance and Composition Are Composition and Inheritance the same? If I want to implement the composition pattern, how can I do that in Java?
Java: What does the colon (:) operator do? I would look it up myself, but I don't even know what it's called. Would anyone mind explaining what it does? I didn't know there were multiple times the : appeared. What does it do in this case here: <-- How would you write this for-each loop a different way so as to not incorporate the ":"?
inner class within Interface is that possible to create a inner class within an interface? If yes, why do we create like that? Anyways we are not going to create any interface objects? Do they help in any Development process?
How to store Java Date to Mysql datetime...? Can any body tell me how can I store Java Date to Mysql datetime...? When I am trying to do so...only date is stored and time remain 00:00:00 in Mysql date stores like this... I want not only date but also time...like I am using JPA(Hibernate) with spring mydomain classes uses java.util.Date but i have created tables using handwritten queries... this is my create statement
Execute method on startup in spring Is there any Spring 3 feature to execute some methods when the application starts for the first time? I know that I can do the trick of setting a method with @Scheduled annotation and it executes just after the startup, but then it will execute periodically. Thanks.
leiningen - how to add dependencies for local jars? I want to use leiningen to build and develop my clojure project. Is there a way to modify project.clj to tell it to pick some jars from local directories? I have some proprietary jars that cannot be uploaded to public repos. Also, can leiningen be used to maintain a "lib" directory for clojure projects? If a bunch of my clojure projects share the same jars, I don't want to maintain a separate copy for each of them. Thanks
Converting an int to a binary string representation in Java? What would be the best way (ideally, simplest) to convert an int to a binary string representation in Java? For example, say the int is 156. The binary string representation of this would be "10011100".
How to escape the equals sign in properties files How can I escape the equals sign (=) in Java property files? I would like to put something as the following in my file:
"Code too large" compilation error in Java Is there any maximum size for code in Java? I wrote a function with more than 10,000 lines. Actually, each line assigns a value to an array variable. And while compiling, I get this error: code too large How do I overcome this?
Getting Class type from String I have a String which has a name of a class say "Ex" (no .class extension). I want to assign it to a Class variable, like this: How can i do that?
How to check if a subclass is an instance of a class at runtime? In an android app test suite I have a class like this where B is a view: now I have a list of view objects which may contain A objects but in this case I only care if they're subclasses or "instances of" B. I'd like to do something like: this is an instance of B The problem is that when the if encounters an A object it doesn't evaluate to an "instance of B". Is there a way to do isSubclassOf or something?
When should I use "this" in a class? I know that this refers to a current object. But I do not know when I really need to use it. For example, will be there any difference if I use x instead of this.x in some of the methods? May be x will refer to a variable which is local for the considered method? I mean variable which is seen only in this method. What about this.method()? Can I use it? Should I use it. If I just use method(), will it not be, by default, applied to the current object?
NullPointerException in Java with no StackTrace I've had instances of our Java code catch a NullPointerException, but when I try to log the StackTrace (which basically ends up calling Throwable.printStackTrace() ), all I get is: Has anyone else come across this? I tried googling for "java null pointer empty stack trace" but didn't come across anything like this.
Why is it bad practice to call System.gc()? After answering a question about how to force-free objects in Java (the guy was clearing a 1.5GB HashMap) with System.gc(), I was told it's bad practice to call System.gc() manually, but the comments were not entirely convincing. In addition, no one seemed to dare to upvote, nor downvote my answer. I was told there that it's bad practice, but then I was also told that garbage collector runs don't systematically stop the world anymore, and that it could also effectively be used by the JVM only as a hint, so I'm kind of at loss. I do understand that the JVM usually knows better than you when it needs to reclaim memory. I also understand that worrying about a few kilobytes of data is silly. I also understand that even megabytes of data isn't what it was a few years back. But still, 1.5 gigabytes? And you know there's like 1.5 GB of data hanging around in memory; it's not like it's a shot in the dark. Is System.gc() systematically bad, or is there some point at which it becomes okay? So the question is actually double: Why is or isn't it bad practice to call System.gc()? Is it really merely a hint to the JVM under certain implementations, or is it always a full collection cycle? Are there really garbage collector implementations that can do their work without stopping the world? Please shed some light over the various assertions people have made in the comments to my answer. Where's the threshold? Is it never a good idea to call System.gc(), or are there times when it's acceptable? If so, what are those times?
How to define a List bean in Spring? I'm using Spring to define stages in my application. It's configured that the necessary class (here called Configurator) is injected with the stages. Now I need the List of Stages in another class, named LoginBean. The Configurator doesn't offer access to his List of Stages. I cannot change the class Configurator. My Idea: Define a new bean called Stages and inject it to Configurator and LoginBean. My problem with this idea is that I don't know how to transform this property: into a bean. Something like this does not work: Can anybody help me with this?
Difference between File.separator and slash in paths What is the difference between using File.separator and a normal / in a Java Path-String? In contrast to double backslash \\ platform independence seems not to be the reason, since both versions work under Windows and Unix. is exists assertThat To rephrase the question, if / works on Unix and Windows, why should one ever want to use File.separator?
How to avoid Dependency Injection constructor madness? I find that my constructors are starting to look like this: with ever increasing parameter list. Since "Container" is my dependency injection container, why can't I just do this: for every class? What are the downsides? If I do this, it feels like I'm using a glorified static. Please share your thoughts on IoC and Dependency Injection madness.
Static Initialization Blocks As far as I understood the "static initialization block" is used to set values of static field if it cannot be done in one line. But I do not understand why we need a special block for that. For example we declare a field as static (without a value assignment). And then write several lines of the code which generate and assign a value to the above declared static field. Why do we need this lines in a special block like: static {...}?
make a JLabel wrap it's text by setting a max width I have a JLabel which has a lot of text on it. Is there a way to make the JLabel have a max width so that it will wrap the text to make it not exceed this width? Thanks
IntelliJ IDEA with Junit 4.7 "!!! JUnit version 3.8 or later expected:" When I attempt to run the following test in IntelliJ IDEA I get the message: "!!! JUnit version 3.8 or later expected:" It should be noted that this is an Android project I am working on in IntelliJ IDEA 9. getScore assertEquals calculateResults getHoleScoreMap put setScore The full stack trace looks like this...
How to upload files to server using JSP/Servlet? How can I upload files to server using JSP/Servlet? I tried this: However, I only get the file name, not the file content. When I add enctype="multipart/form-data" to the <form>, then request.getParameter() returns null. During research I stumbled upon Apache Common FileUpload. I tried this: This line is where it died. Unfortunately, the servlet threw an exception without a clear message and cause. Here is the stacktrace:
Volatile Vs Static in java Is it correct to say that static means one copy of the value for all objects and volatile means one copy of the value for all threads? Anyway a static variable value is also going to be one value for all threads, then why should we go for volatile?
What is a Java ClassLoader? In a few simple sentences, what is a Java ClassLoader, when is it used and why? OK, I read a wiki article. ClassLoader loads classes. OK. So if I include jar files and import, a ClassLoader does the job. Why should I bother with this ClassLoader? I've never used it and didn't know it existed. The question is, why does the ClassLoader class exist? And also, how do you use it in practice? (Cases exist, I know.)
Variable length (Dynamic) Arrays in Java I was wondering how to initialise an integer array such that it's size and values change through out the execution of my program, any suggestions?
Clone() vs Copy constructor- which is recommended in java clone method vs copy constructor in java. which one is correct solution. where to use each case?
Use of class definitions inside a method in Java Example: I found out that the above piece of code is perfectly legal in Java. I have the following questions. What is the use of ever having a class definition inside a method? Will a class file be generated for DummyClass Its hard for me to imagine this concept in an Object Oriented manner. Having a class definition inside a behavior. Probably can someone tell me with equivalent real world examples. Abstract classes inside a method sounds a bit crazy to me. But no interfaces allowed. Is there any reason behind this?
Java - when to use 'this' keyword What is the best practise for using the this keyword in Java? For example, I have the following class: That's fine and all, but Java is clever enough to know what is happening if I change the statement in the constructor to So why use the this keyword? (I realise in some situations, it's totally necessary to use it, I'm just asking for situations like this). Actually, I tend to use the keyword purely for readability sake but what's the common practise? Using it all over the shop makes my code look a bit messy, for example Obviously a poor bit of code but it illustrates my example. Is it just down to personal preference in these cases?
In Java how does one turn a String into a char or a char into a String? Is there a way to turn a char into a String or a String with one letter into a char (like how you can turn an int into a double and a double into an int)? (please link to the relevant documentation if you can). How do I go about finding something like this that I'm only vaguely aware of in the documentation?
How to convert a scala.List to a java.util.List? How to convert Scala's scala.List into Java's java.util.List?
Why are interface variables static and final by default? Why are interface variables static and final by default in Java?
Alternative to a goto statement in Java What is an alternative function for the goto keyword in Java? Since Java does not have a goto.
Best practice for passing many arguments to method? Occasionally , we have to write methods that receive many many arguments , for example : When I encounter this kind of problem , I often encapsulate arguments into a map. extracting params This is not a good practice , encapsulate params into a map is totally a waste of efficiency. The good thing is , the clean signature , easy to add other params with fewest modification . what's the best practice for this kind of problem ?
Difference of Maven JAXB plugins I have determined that two JAXB plugins for Maven 2 exist, with some different configurations. The one is from Sun: http://jaxb.dev.java.net/jaxb-maven2-plugin/, the other from Mojohaus: http://mojohaus.org/jaxb2-maven-plugin/ Which of these two plugins can be recommended? Thanks Matt. On my little research project, I found that there's quite another plugin comming from the sunners: and that one: and still the one from Codehouse.
Difference in System. exit(0) , System.exit(-1), System.exit(1 ) in Java I'd like to know the difference between the following in Java When do I have to use the above code appropriately?
How to change context root of a dynamic web project in Eclipse? I have developed a dynamic web project in Eclipse. Now I can access it through my browser using the following URL: Now I want to change the access URL to I changed the context root from the project "Properties | Web Project Settings | Context Root". But it is not working. The web app still has the access URL as earlier. I have re-deployed the application on Tomcat, re-started the Tomcat and have done everything that should be done, but the access URL is the same as earlier. I found that there were no server.xml file attached with the WAR file. Then how the Tomcat is determining that the context root of my web app is /MyDynamicWebApp and is allowing me to access the application through that URL?
What is the difference between String and StringBuffer in Java? What is the difference between String and StringBuffer in Java? Is there a maximum size for String?
Overload with different return type in Java? Why is it not possible to overload a function just by changing the return type? Will that change in a future version of Java? By the way, just for reference, is this possible in C++?
Android Color Picker Does anyone know of a quick color picker widget that I could grab to use in my application? I've seen one in a few different applications that have a wheel with colors, and that you tap in the center to select, but I'm not sure where to find it. Any color picker would be fine though.
How to set JFrame to appear centered, regardless of monitor resolution? While working with Java, I find it hard to position my main window in the center of the screen when I start the application. Is there any way I can do that? It doesn't have to be vertically centered, horizontal alignment is the more important goal for me. But vertical alignment is also welcome.
How do I make my ArrayList Thread-Safe? Another approach to problem in Java? I have an ArrayList that I want to use to hold RaceCar objects that extend the Thread class as soon as they are finished executing. A class, called Race, handles this ArrayList using a callback method that the RaceCar object calls when it is finished executing. The callback method, addFinisher(RaceCar finisher), adds the RaceCar object to the ArrayList. This is supposed to give the order in which the Threads finish executing. I know that ArrayList isn't synchronized and thus isn't thread-safe. I tried using the Collections.synchronizedCollection(c Collection) method by passing in a new ArrayList and assigning the returned Collection to an ArrayList. However, this gives me a compiler error: Here is the relevant code: Make an ArrayList to hold RaceCar objects to determine winners Fill array with RaceCar objects Add this as a RaceListener to each RaceCar Implement the one method in the RaceListener interface What I need to know is, am I using a correct approach and if not, what should I use to make my code thread-safe? Thanks for the help!
What is the difference between a HashMap and a TreeMap? I started learning Java. When would I use a HashMap over a TreeMap?
Change Name of Import in Java, or import two classes with the same name In Python you can do a: How would you do this in Java, as I have two imports that are clashing.
Convert Existing Eclipse Project to Maven Project For a project at work, we're considering using the Maven plugin for Eclipse to automate our builds. Right now the procedure is far more complicated than it ought to be, and we're hoping that Maven will simplify things to a one-click build. My question is, is there a wizard or automatic importer for converting an existing Eclipse Java project to a Maven project, using the Maven plugin? Or should I create a new Maven project and manually copy over all source files, libs, etc.
How do I apply the for-each loop to every character in a String? So I want to iterate for each character in a string. So I thought: but I get a compiler error: How can I do this?
Render a PDF file using Java on Android I realized that Android has no built-in method of displaying PDF files. How can I render a PDF file using Java on Android?
Executable war file that starts jetty without maven I'm trying to make an "executable" war file (java -jar myWarFile.war) that will start up a Jetty webserver that hosts the webapp contained in the WAR file I executed. I found a page that described how to make what I'm looking for: However, following that advice along with how I think I'm supposed to make an executable jar (war) isn't working. I have an Ant task creating a WAR file with a manifest that looks like: The contents of the WAR file look like: When I try to execute the WAR file, the error is: There appears to be two errors here: one where it seems the JAR files can't be found, and one where the Start class can't be found. To fix the first one, I put the Jetty JAR files in the base of the WAR file and tried again -- same error. I also tried adding the WEB-INF/lib/<specific-JAR-files> to the Class-Path attribute of the manifest. That did not work either. Does anyone have any insight as to what I'm doing right/wrong and how I can get this executable WAR file up and running?
Enum.values() vs EnumSet.allOf( ). Which one is more preferable? I looked under the hood for EnumSet.allOf and it looks very efficient, especially for enums with less than 64 values. Basically all sets share the single array of all possible enum values and the only other piece of information is a bitmask which in case of allOf is set in one swoop. On the other hand Enum.values() seems to be a bit of black magic. Moreover it returns an array, not a collection, so in many cases it must be decorated with Arrays.asList( ) to be usable in any place that expects collection. So, should EnumSet.allOf be more preferable to Enum.values? More specifically, which form of for iterator should be used: or
java.lang.UnsupportedClassVersionError: Bad version number in .class file? I am getting this error when I include an opensource library that I had to compile from source. Now, all the suggestions on the web indicate that the code was compiled in one version and executed in another version (new on old). However, I only have one version of JRE on my system. If I run the commands: and check in Eclipse for the properties of the java library, I get 1.5.0_18 Therefore, I have to conclude something else, internal to a class itself, is throwing the exception?? Is that even possible?
How do I assert my exception message with JUnit Test annotation? I have written a few JUnit tests with @Test annotation. If my test method throws a checked exception and if I want to assert the message along with the exception, is there a way to do so with JUnit @Test annotation? AFAIK, JUnit 4.7 doesn't provide this feature but does any future versions provide it? I know in .NET you can assert the message and the exception class. Looking for similar feature in the Java world. This is what I want:
Set margins in a LinearLayout programmatically I'm trying to use Java (not XML) to create a LinearLayout with buttons that fill the screen, and have margins. Here is code that works without margins: Verbose! This is critical. Doesn't work without it. So that works fine, but how on earth do you give the buttons margins so there is space between them? I tried using LinearLayout.MarginLayoutParams, but that has no weight member so it's no good. And it doesn't work if you pass it lp in its constructor either. Is this impossible? Because it sure looks it, and it wouldn't be the first Android layout task you can only do in XML.
How can I avoid garbage collection delays in Java games? (Best Practices) I'm performance tuning interactive games in Java for the Android platform. Once in a while there is a hiccup in drawing and interaction for garbage collection. Usually it's less than one tenth of a second, but sometimes it can be as large as 200ms on very slow devices. I am using the ddms profiler (part of the Android SDK) to search out where my memory allocations come from and excise them from my inner drawing and logic loops. The worst offender had been short loops done like, where every single time the loop was executed there was an iterator allocated. I'm using arrays (ArrayList) for my objects now. If I ever want trees or hashes in an inner loop I know that I need to be careful or even reimplement them instead of using the Java Collections framework since I can't afford the extra garbage collection. That may come up when I'm looking at priority queues. I also have trouble where I want to display scores and progress using Canvas.drawText. This is bad, because Strings, char arrays and StringBuffers will be allocated all over to make it work. If you have a few text display items and run the frame 60 times a second that begins to add up and will increase your garbage collection hiccups. I think the best choice here is to keep char[] arrays and decode your int or double manually into it and concatenate strings onto the beginning and end. I'd like to hear if there's something cleaner. I know there must be others out there dealing with this. How do you handle it and what are the pitfalls and best practices you've discovered to run interactively on Java or Android? These gc issues are enough to make me miss manual memory management, but not very much.
What is the Java string pool and how is "s" different from new String("s")? What is meant by String Pool? And what is the difference between the following declarations: Is there any difference between the storing of these two strings by the JVM?
Shortcut "or-assignment" (|=) operator in Java I have a long set of comparisons to do in Java, and I'd like to know if one or more of them come out as true. The string of comparisons was long and difficult to read, so I broke it up for readability, and automatically went to use a shortcut operator |= rather than negativeValue = negativeValue || boolean. I expect negativeValue to be true if any of the default<something> values are negative. Is this valid? Will it do what I expect? I couldn't see it mentioned on Sun's site or stackoverflow, but Eclipse doesn't seem to have a problem with it and the code compiles and runs. Similarly, if I wanted to perform several logical intersections, could I use &= instead of &&?
What is a Maven artifact? What is an artifact and why does Maven need it?
How a thread should close itself in Java? This is a short question. At some point my thread understand that it should suicide. What is the best way to do it: Thread.currentThread().interrupt(); return; By the way, why in the first case we need to use currentThread? Is Thread does not refer to the current thread?
Android Reading from an Input stream efficiently I am making an HTTP get request to a website for an android application I am making. I am using a DefaultHttpClient and using HttpGet to issue the request. I get the entity response and from this obtain an InputStream object for getting the html of the page. I then cycle through the reply doing as follows: However this is horrendously slow. Is this inefficient? I'm not loading a big web page - www.cokezone.co.uk so the file size is not big. Is there a better way to do this? Thanks Andy
How to set a JVM TimeZone Properly I am trying to run a Java program, but it is taking a default GMT timezone instead of an OS defined timezone. My JDK version is 1.5 and the OS is Windows Server Enterprise (2007) Windows has a Central timezone specified, but when I run the following program, it gives me a GMT time. println getTime getTimeZone getInstance java.util.Calendar Here is the output Please note that I do not want to set the timezone from the application. I want that the timezone used by JVM should be the one specified in the OS. (I am not finding this issues with other servers that have version 1.4 of JDK and Microsoft Server 2003). Any thoughts would be highly appreciated.
Eclipse: Should I create a workspace for each project? I am simply wondering whether it is best to put all of my Eclipse projects into one workspace, or do a 1 workspace per 1 project. I am just a solo developer, for hobby more or less, but the apps I create do actually have production versions that are running on rather frequent cron jobs, so its almost like an amateur production environment. The only problems I have noticed so far is for exporting JARs, I have the potential to include source files from other projects which seems like it could get messy.
Java EE 6 vs. Spring 3 stack I'm starting a new project now. I have to choose technologies. I need something light, so no EJB or Seam. On the other hand I need JPA (Hibernate or alternative) and JSF with IceFaces. Do you think that such a stack on Spring 3 deployed on Tomcat is a good choice? Or a Java EE 6 web application could be better? I'm afraid that Java EE 6 is a new technology, not well documented yet. Tomcat seems to be easier to maintain than Glassfish 3. What's your opinion? Do you have any experiences?
Specify JDK for Maven to use I am trying to build a Hudson plugin I've modified and it requires jdk1.6. This is fine, but I don't see how I can tell maven where the different jdk is. I've found few mentions on the internet but they don't seem to apply to me. Some suggest adding some config to .m2/settings.xml but I don't have a settings.xml. Plus, I don't want to use 1.6 for all maven builds. One kink is I am using mvn in cygwin, if that matters at all. It appears I should be able to make the specification in the project pom file, but the existing pom is pretty bare. So bottom line is, is there a way to specify a jdk for a single invocation of maven?
Why can Java Collections not directly store Primitives types? Java collections only store Objects, not primitive types; however we can store the wrapper classes. Why this constraint?
How to read integer value from the standard input in Java What class can I use for reading an integer variable in Java?
When is the finalize() method called in Java? I need to know when the finalize() method is called in the JVM. I created a test class which writes into a file when the finalize() method is called by overriding it. It is not executed. Can anybody tell me the reason why it is not executing?
Is there a way to specify a default property value in Spring XML? We are using a PropertyPlaceholderConfigurer to use java properties in our Spring configuration (details here) eg: We would like to add an additional property, but have a distributed system where existing instances could all use a default value. Is there a way to avoid updating all of our properties files, by indicating a default value in the Spring config for when there isn't an overriding property value defined?
how good is java's UUID.randomUUID? I know that randomized UUIDs have a very, very, very low probability for collision in theory, but I am wondering, in practice, how good is Java 5's randomUUID() in terms of not having collision? Does anybody have any experience to share?
Why is there no multiple inheritance in Java, but implementing multiple interfaces is allowed? Java doesn't allow multiple inheritance, but it allows implementing multiple interfaces. Why?
Comparing two java.util.Dates to see if they are in the same day I need to compare two Dates (e.g. date1 and date2) and come up with a boolean sameDay which is true of the two Dates share the same day, and false if they are not. How can I do this? There seems to be a whirlwind of confusion here... and I would like to avoid pulling in other dependencies beyond the JDK if at all possible. to clarify: if date1 and date2 share the same year, month, and day, then sameDay is true, otherwise it is false. I realize this requires knowledge of a timezone... it would be nice to pass in a timezone but I can live with either GMT or local time as long as I know what the behavior is. again, to clarify:
How to get Locale from its String representation in Java? Is there a neat way of getting a Locale instance from its "programmatic name" as returned by Locale's toString() method? An obvious and ugly solution would be parsing the String and then constructing a new Locale instance according to that, but maybe there's a better way / ready solution for that? The need is that I want to store some locale specific settings in a SQL database, including Locales themselves, but it would be ugly to put serialized Locale objects there. I would rather store their String representations, which seem to be quite adequate in detail.
Hidden Features IntelliJ IDEA Just another Hidden features and tips and tricks WIKI. After seeing the hidden features of eclipse, java, spring framework I thought we need to have a list of the features, TIPS for IntelliJ too which is the best and the Intelligent IDE available for java.
How to convert a JSON string to a Map with Jackson JSON This is my first time trying to do something useful with Java.. I'm trying to do something like this but it doesn't work: But the IDE says: 'Unchecked assignment Map to Map<String,String>' What's the right way to do this? I'm only using Jackson because that's what is already available in the project, is there a native Java way of converting to/from JSON? In PHP I would simply json_decode($str) and I'd get back an array. I need basically the same thing here. Thanks!
Analogues of Java and .NET technologies/frameworks I work in a shop that is a mix of mostly Java and .NET technologists. When discussing new solutions and architectures we often encounter impedance in trying to compare the various technologies, frameworks, APIs etc. in use between the two camps. It seems that each camp knows little about the other and we end up comparing apples to oranges and forgetting about the bushels. While researching the topic I found this: Java --> .Net rough equivalents It's a nice list but it's not quite exhaustive and is missing the key .NET 3.0 technologies and a few other tidbits. To complete that list: what are the near/rough equivalents (or a combination of technologies) in Java to the following in .NET? WCF ~= WPF ~= Silverlight ~= WF ~= Generics ~= Extension Methods ~= Lambda expressions ~= Linq (not Linq-to-SQL) ~= TPL ~= F# ~= IronPython ~= IronRuby ~= ...have i missed anything else? Java Technologies (are there .NET equivalents?): ~= EJB ~= WebSphere ~= GlassFish ~= JBoss App Server ~= Tomcat? Note that I omitted technologies that are already covered in the linked article. I would also like to hear feedback on whether the linked article is accurate. Note: This seems to be turning into a wiki-type article so i marked it as such.
Why do Java programmers like to name a variable "clazz"? I've seen lots of codes have declaration like Class clazz , where does this originate from ? Is this some kind of convention ? I think 'clazz' is not even an English word , has no meaning at all , how can so many programmers name a wrong name coincidentally ?
How can I disable the default console handler, while using the java logging API? Hi I am trying to implement the java logging in my application. I want to use two handlers. A file handler and my own console handler. Both of my handlers work fine. My logging is send to a file and to the console . My logging is also sent to the default console handler, which i do not want. If you run my code you will see extra two line sent to the console. I don't want to use the default console handler. Does anyone know how to disable the default console handler. I only want to use the two handlers I have created. getSourceMethodName addHandler append java.util.Date java.util.logging.Level setFormatter java.util.logging.LogManager java.util.logging.LogRecord java.util.logging.ConsoleHandler addLogger getMessage getProperty getSourceClassName java.util.logging.FileHandler getLogManager toString printStackTrace getLogger setLevel java.util.logging.Formatter java.util.logging.Handler info java.util.logging.Logger getLevel
List all files from a directory recursively with Java I have this function that prints the name of all the files in a directory recursively. The problem is that my code is very slow because it has to access a remote network device with every iteration. My plan is to first load all the files from the directory recursively and then after that go through all files with the regex to filter out all the files I don't want. Does anyone have a better suggestion? This is just a test later on I'm not going to use the code like this, instead I'm going to add the path and modification date of every file which matches an advanced regex to an array.
A simple scenario using wait() and notify() in java Can I get a complete simple scenario i.e. tutorial that suggest how this should be used, specifically with a Queue?
Hibernate show real SQL if I set in my hibernate.cfg.xml configuration file in the console I can see the SQL. But it's not real SQL... Can I see the SQL code that will be passed directly to database? Example: I see Can I see the real SQL?
Best Java obfuscator? I am developing a security software and want to obfuscate my java code so it will become impossible to reverse engineer. What is the most reliable java obfuscator ?
How to display an output of float data with 2 decimal places in Java? Can I do it with System.out.print?
How to gracefully handle the SIGKILL signal in Java How do you handle clean up when the program receives a kill signal? For instance, there is an application I connect to that wants any third party app (my app) to send a finish command when logging out. What is the best say to send that finish command when my app has been destroyed with a kill -9? edit 1: kill -9 cannot be captured. Thank you guys for correcting me. edit 2: I guess this case would be when the one calls just kill which is the same as ctrl-c
Is there a goto statement in Java? I'm confused about this. Most of us have been told that there isn't any goto statement in Java. But I found that it is one of the keywords in Java. Where can it be used? If it can not be used, then why was it included in Java as a keyword?
Foreign key constraints in Android using SQLite? on Delete cascade I have two tables: tracks and waypoints, a track can have many waypoints, but a waypoint is assigned to only 1 track. In the way points table I have a column called "trackidfk" which inserts the track_ID once a track is made, however I have not setup Foreign Key constraints on this column. When I delete a track I want to delete the assigned waypoints, is this possible?. I read about using Triggers but I don't think they are supported in Android. To create the waypoints table:
Java: random long number in 0 <= x < n range Random class has a method to generate random int in a given range. For example: This would generate an int number more or equal to 0 and less than 100. I'd like to do exactly the same with long number. Random class has only nextLong(), but it doesn't allow to set range.
is guava-libraries available in maven repo? I am looking to find guava-libraries in maven repository. It looks like guava is adding more features to google-collections library.
Converting List to String[] in Java How do I convert a list into an array? The following code returns an error. Error:
Interview question: Check if one string is a rotation of other string A friend of mine was asked the following question today at interview for the position of software developer: Given two string s1 and s2 how will you check if s1 is a rotated version of s2 ? Example: If s1 = "stackoverflow" then the following are some of its rotated versions: where as "stackoverflwo" is not a rotated version. The answer he gave was: Take s2 and find the longest prefix that is a sub string of s1, that will give you the point of rotation. Once you find that point, break s2 at that point to get s2a and s2b, then just check if concatenate(s2a,s2b) == s1 It looks like a good solution to me and my friend. But the interviewer thought otherwise. He asked for a simpler solution. Please help me by telling how would you do this in Java/C/C++ ? Thanks in advance.
what are good blogs to read relating java, spring, hibernate, maven? To continue to question further I'm more interested in blogs, websites who once in a while release a tutorial, tip or best-practice on the topics I mentioned. For ex : http://net.tutsplus.com/ is very good website to follow if you wanna learn about or upgrade your knowledge about CSS, HTML, Javascript, PHP .. Is there a website like this for Java and related technologies?
How to update maven repository in Eclipse? Assuming you're already using the m2eclipse plugin, what can you do it doesn't update the dependencies to the latest in your repo. For example, on the command line you can just add the -U flag as in: ...to force the dependencies to be updated. Is there something like this within Eclipse? (It doesn't always seem to pick up the latest updates.)
Non-static variable cannot be referenced from a static context I've written this test code: println But it gives the following error: How do I get my methods to recognize my class variables?
How do I convert CamelCase into human-readable names in Java? I'd like to write a method that converts CamelCase into a human-readable name. Here's the test case:
What is the use of printStackTrace() method in Java? I am going through a socket program. In it, printStackTrace is called on the IOException object in the catch block. What does printStackTrace() actually do? I am unaware of its purpose. What is it used for?
Java: how to initialize String[]? Error Code
How to send SMS in Java What are the possible ways to send and receive sms from java application ? Note: I am expecting a list of possible ways. also your opinion about each, which is better / how?
Java - JPA - @Version annotation How does @Version annotation work in JPA? I found various answers whose extract is as follows: JPA uses a version field in your entities to detect concurrent modifications to the same datastore record. When the JPA runtime detects an attempt to concurrently modify the same record, it throws an exception to the transaction attempting to commit last. But I am still not sure how it works. Also as from the following lines: You should consider version fields immutable. Changing the field value has undefined results. Does it mean that we should declare our version field as final?
How to time Java program execution speed Sorry if this sounds like a dumb question but how do you time the execution of a java program? I'm not sure what class I should use to do this. I'm kinda looking for something like: Some timer starts here Do something End timer here Thanks
maintaining TreeSet sort as object changes value I've got a object that defines a 'natural sort order' using Comparable<>. These are being stored in TreeSets. Other than removing and re-adding the object, is there another way to update the sort when the members that are used to define the sort order are updated?
simpledateformat parsing date with 'Z' literal I am trying to parse a date that looks like this: This is a valid date per http://www.ietf.org/rfc/rfc3339.txt. The 'Z' literal "imply that UTC is the preferred reference point for the specified time." If I try to parse it using SimpleDateFormat and this pattern: It will be parsed as a Mon Apr 05 17:16:00 EDT 2010 SimpleDateFormat is unable to parse the string with these patterns: I can explicitly set the TimeZone to use on the SimpleDateFormat to get the expected output, but I don't think that should be necessary. Is there something I am missing? Is there an alternative date parser?
In a bidirectional JPA OneToMany/ManyToOne association, what is meant by "the inverse side of the association"? In these examples on TopLink JPA Annotation Reference: Example 1-59 @OneToMany - Customer Class With Generics Example 1-60 @ManyToOne - Order Class With Generics It seems to me that the Customer entity is the owner of the association. However, in the explanation for the mappedBy attribute in the same document, it is written that: if the relationship is bidirectional, then set the mappedBy element on the inverse (non-owning) side of the association to the name of the field or property that owns the relationship as Example 1-60 shows. However, if I am not wrong, it looks like in the example, the mappedBy is actually specified on the owning side of the association, rather than the non-owning side. So my question is basically: In a bidirectional (one-to-many/many-to-one) association, which of the entities is the owner? How can we designate the One side as the owner? How can we designate the Many side as the owner? What is meant by "the inverse side of the association"? How can we designate the One side as the inverse? How can we designate the Many side as the inverse?
Is Catching a Null Pointer Exception a Code Smell? Recently a co-worker of mine wrote in some code to catch a null pointer exception around an entire method, and return a single result. I pointed out how there could've been any number of reasons for the null pointer, so we changed it to a defensive check for the one result. However, catching NullPointerException just seemed wrong to me. In my mind, Null pointer exceptions are the result of bad code and not to be an expected exception in the system. Are there any cases where it makes sense to catch a null pointer exception?
How to use cURL in Java? I am a newbie in java and wanted to use curl in java. What is my question is curl built-in in java or I have to install it from any 3rd party source to use with Java. If so, how to install curl in java. I have been googling for a long time but didnt find any help. Hope anyone can help me out there. Thanks in advance.
What is more efficient: System.arraycopy vs Arrays.copyOf? The toArray method in ArrayList , Bloch uses both System.arraycopy and Arrays.copyOf to copy an array . Make a new array of a's runtime type, but my contents: How to compare these two copy methods , when to use which?
Getting Java version at runtime I need to work around a Java bug in JDK 1.5 which was fixed in 1.6. I'm using the following condition: Will this work for other JVMs? Is there a better way to check this?
How to parse JSON in Java I have the following JSON text that I need to parse to get pageName, pagePic, post_id, etc. What is the required code?
Why has it failed to load main-class manifest attribute from a JAR file? I have created a JAR file in this way jar cf jar-file input-files. Now, I'm trying to run it. Running it does not work (jre command is not found): This does not work either: (Failed to load Main-Class manifest attribute from main.jar). I also found out that To run an application packaged as a JAR file (version 1.2 -- requires Main-Class manifest header) What is the "Main-Class manifest header"? How do I create it and where do I put it?
How to compare dates in Java? How do I compare dates in between in Java? Example: date1 is 22-02-2010 date2 is 07-04-2010 today date3 is 25-12-2010 date3 is always greater than date1 and date2 is always today. How do I verify if today's date is in between date1 and date 3?
Android: howto parse URL String with spaces to URI object? I have a string representing an URL containing spaces and want to convert it to an URI object. If is simple try to do it gives me where index X is the position of the first space in the URL string. How can i parse myStringinto a URI object?
Easy way to get a test file into JUnit Can somebody suggest an easy way to get a reference to a file as a String/InputStream/File/etc type object in a junit test class? Obviously I could paste the file (xml in this case) in as a giant String or read it in as a file but is there a shortcut specific to Junit like this?
Java - Method name collision in interface implementation If I have two interfaces , both quite different in their purposes , but with same method signature , how do I make a class implement both without being forced to write a single method that serves for the both the interfaces and writing some convoluted logic in the method implementation that checks for which type of object the call is being made and invoke proper code ? In C# , this is overcome by what is called as explicit interface implementation. Is there any equivalent way in Java ?
How to check if my string is equal to null? I want to perform some action ONLY IF my string has a meaningful value. So, I tried this. and this and this and this and this And in all cases my program doSomething in spite on the fact that my string IS EMPTY. It equals to null. So, what is wrong with that? ADDED: I found the reason of the problem. The variable was declared as a string and, as a consequence, null assigned to this variable was transformed to "null"! So, if (!myString.equals("null")) works.
Could someone in simple terms explain to me the visitor pattern's purpose with examples if possible I'm really confused about the visitor pattern and its uses. I can't really seem to visualize the benefits of using this pattern or its purpose. If someone could explain with examples if possible that would be great. =) Thanks in advance
Is there an eval() function in Java? I have a string like the following: Now I have to get the result of 20 by using the string. I know in some other languages the eval() function will do this. How can I do this in Java?
Converting array to list in Java How do I convert an array to a list in Java? I used the Arrays.asList() but the behavior (and signature) somehow changed from Java SE 1.4.2 (docs now in archive) to 8 and most snippets I found on the web use the 1.4.2 behaviour. For example: on 1.4.2 returns a list containing the elements 1, 2, 3 on 1.5.0+ returns a list containing the array spam In many cases it should be easy to detect, but sometimes it can slip unnoticed:
How can I trim beginning and ending double quotes from a string? I would like to trim a beginning and ending double quote (") from a string. How can I achieve that in Java? Thanks!
How do I change the Javadocs template generated in Eclipse? I dislike the default Javadocs generated for me when I create a Class or methods, especially the @author variable, which is the current system username on my windows box. I would like to change it. Is this possible?
How to get the number of columns from a JDBC ResultSet? I am using CsvJdbc (it is a JDBC-driver for csv-files) to access a csv-file. I don't know how many columns the csv-file contains. How can I get the number of columns? Is there any JDBC-function for this? I can not find any methods for this in java.sql.ResultSet. For accessing the file, I use code similar to the example on the CsvJdbc website.
Does it make sense to do "try-finally" without "catch"? I saw some code like this: I thought try is supposed to have a catch? Why does this code do it this way?
Java: method to get position of a match in a String? should be 10, is there such a method?
In Java, what does NaN mean? I have a program that tries to shrink a double down to a desired number. The output I get is NaN. What does NaN mean in Java?
custom listview adapter getView method being called multiple times, and in no coherent order I have a custom list adapter: in the overridden 'getView' method I do a print to check what position is and whether it is a convertView or not: The output of this (when the list is first displayed, no user input as yet) AFAIK, though I couldn't find it stated explicitly, getView() is only called for visible rows. Since my app starts with four visible rows at least the position numbers cycling from 0-3 makes sense. But the rest is a mess: Why is getview called for each row three times? Where are these convertViews coming from when I haven't scrolled yet? I did a bit of reseach, and without getting a good answer, I did notice that people were associating this issue with layout issues. So in case, here's the layout that contains the list: and the layout of each individual row: Thank you for your time
How to set java_home on Windows 7? I went to the Environment Variables in 'System' in the control panel and made two new variables, one for user variables and one for system variables. Both were named JAVA_HOME and both pointing to C:\Sun\SDK\jdk\bin But for some reason, I still get the below error when running a Java command... How can I fix this problem?
Setting log level of message at runtime in slf4j When using log4j, the Logger.log(Priority p, Object message) method is available and can be used to log a message at a log level determined at runtime. We're using this fact and this tip to redirect stderr to a logger at a specific log level. slf4j doesn't have a generic log() method that I can find. Does that mean there's no way to implement the above?
Is an "infinite" iterator bad design? Is it generally considered bad practice to provide Iterator implementations that are "infinite"; i.e. where calls to hasNext() always(*) return true? Typically I'd say "yes" because the calling code could behave erratically, but in the below implementation hasNext() will return true unless the caller removes all elements from the List that the iterator was initialised with; i.e. there is a termination condition. Do you think this is a legitimate use of Iterator? It doesn't seem to violate the contract although I suppose one could argue it's unintuitive. (Pedantic) EDIT Some people have commented how an Iterator could be used to generate values from an unbounded sequence such as the Fibonacci sequence. However, the Java Iterator documentation states that an Iterator is: An iterator over a collection. Now you could argue that the Fibonacci sequence is an infinite collection but in Java I would equate collection with the java.util.Collection interface, which offers methods such as size() implying that a collection must be bounded. Therefore, is it legitimate to use Iterator as a generator of values from an unbounded sequence?
Good Hash Function for Strings I'm trying to think up a good hash function for strings. And I was thinking it might be a good idea to sum up the unicode values for the first five characters in the string (assuming it has five, otherwise stop where it ends). Would that be a good idea, or is it a bad one? I am doing this in Java, but I wouldn't imagine that would make much of a difference.
Force Java timezone as GMT/UTC I need to force any time related operations to GMT/UTC, regardless the timezone set on the machine. Any convenient way to so in code? To clarify, I'm using the DB server time for all operations, but it comes out formatted according to local timezone. Thanks!
How to properly match varargs in Mockito I've been trying to get to mock a method with vararg parameters using Mockito: This doesn't work, however if I do this instead: This works, despite that I have completely omitted the varargs argument when stubbing the method. Any clues?
How do I hide .class files from the Open Resource dialog in Eclipse? I won't want to have edit any working sets. I just want a way to, across all workspaces and projects, prevent .class files from ever showing in the Open Resource Dialog. Is there a way to do this?
Get JSF managed bean by name in any Servlet related class I'm trying to write a custom servlet (for AJAX/JSON) in which I would like to reference my @ManagedBeans by name. I'm hoping to map: http://host/app/myBean/myProperty to: Is it possible to load a bean by name from a regular servlet? Is there a JSF servlet or helper I could use for it? I seem to be spoilt by Spring in which all this is too obvious.
Best approach for GPGPU/CUDA/OpenCL in Java? General-purpose computing on graphics processing units (GPGPU) is a very attractive concept to harness the power of the GPU for any kind of computing. I'd love to use GPGPU for image processing, particles, and fast geometric operations. Right now, it seems the two contenders in this space are CUDA and OpenCL. I'd like to know: Is OpenCL usable yet from Java on Windows/Mac? What are the libraries ways to interface to OpenCL/CUDA? Is using JNA directly an option? Am I forgetting something? Any real-world experience/examples/war stories are appreciated.
fastest (low latency) method for Inter Process Communication between Java and C/C++ I have a Java app, connecting through TCP socket to a "server" developed in C/C++. both app & server are running on the same machine, a Solaris box (but we're considering migrating to Linux eventually). type of data exchanged is simple messages (login, login ACK, then client asks for something, server replies). each message is around 300 bytes long. Currently we're using Sockets, and all is OK, however I'm looking for a faster way to exchange data (lower latency), using IPC methods. I've been researching the net and came up with references to the following technologies: shared memory pipes queues as well as what's referred as DMA (Direct Memory Access) but I couldn't find proper analysis of their respective performances, neither how to implement them in both JAVA and C/C++ (so that they can talk to each other), except maybe pipes that I could imagine how to do. can anyone comment about performances & feasibility of each method in this context ? any pointer / link to useful implementation information ? EDIT / UPDATE following the comment & answers I got here, I found info about Unix Domain Sockets, which seem to be built just over pipes, and would save me the whole TCP stack. it's platform specific, so I plan on testing it with JNI or either juds or junixsocket. next possible steps would be direct implementation of pipes, then shared memory, although I've been warned of the extra level of complexity... thanks for your help
JUnit confusion: use 'extends TestCase' or '@Test'? I've found the proper use (or at least the documentation) of JUnit very confusing. This question serves both as a future reference and as a real question. If I've understood correctly, there are two main approaches to create and run a JUnit test: Approach A (JUnit 3-style): create a class that extends TestCase, and start test methods with the word test. When running the class as a JUnit Test (in Eclipse), all methods starting with the word test are automatically run. assertEquals junit.framework.TestCase Approach B (JUnit 4-style): create a 'normal' class and prepend a @Test annotation to the method. Note that you do NOT have to start the method with the word test. org.junit.Assert assertEquals org.junit Mixing the two seems not to be a good idea, see e.g. this stackoverflow question: Now, my questions(s): What is the preferred approach, or when would you use one instead of the other? Approach B allows for testing for exceptions by extending the @Test annotation like in @Test(expected = ArithmeticException.class). But how do you test for exceptions when using approach A? When using approach A, you can group a number of test classes in a test suite like this: TestSuite suite = new TestSuite("All tests"); suite.addTestSuite(DummyTestA.class); suite.addTestSuite(DummyTestAbis.class); But this can't be used with approach B (since each testclass should subclass TestCase). What is the proper way to group tests for approach B? Edit: I've added the JUnit versions to both approaches
How to create a project from existing source in Eclipse and then find it? I have created several .java files. All of them are located in one directory. I used a text editor to write these files. Now I want to switch to Eclipse. How can I do it? I have tried many ways. None of them works. ADDED: I think the common way is to have source in the eclipse folder called "workspace". So, how do I get my files in these directory. Should I use eclipse to create a new project from existing source and Eclipse will put all file to the workspace? Or I should manually copy all my files to the workspace? Where should I put my class files than? Should I create a subdirectory? With which name? ADDED 2: When I try to create a project with name "game", the eclipse writes me that a project with such name already exist. But how can I open this project? ADDED 3: In my "workspace" I have created a subdirectory called "game". I copied all my .java file into this subdirectory. Then with Eclipse I created a new project with the name game. As a result, Eclipse created .classpath and .project files in the directory "game". It also created bin and src subdirectories. And now I think it is not the correct way to go. The source files are supposed to be in the "src" directory. Right? And at the moment all my .java files are in the "workspace\game". ADDED 4: I did it other way around. With Eclipse I have created a new project with the name "game". As the result, Eclipse created a folder called "game" into folder "workspace". In "game" the folder I found "src" folder. I copied all my .java files into this folder. But now in the "Package Explorer" I cannot open "src" folder. So, how can I access my source files from Eclipse? Why Eclipse does not want to open the "src" folder?
Singleton design pattern vs Singleton beans in Spring container As we all know we have beans as singleton by default in Spring container and if we have a web application based on Spring framework then in that case do we really need to implement Singleton design pattern to hold global data rather than just creating a bean through spring. Please bear with me if I'm not able to explain what I actually meant to ask.
Why "no projects found to import"? I am trying to "import existing project into workspace". As the "root directory" I select the directory where all my .java (and .class) files are located. Eclipse writes me that "no projects are found to import". Why?
Programming Java 7 in Eclipse I installed JDK 7 and Eclipse 3.6M6. Then, I added JRE 7 as a new JRE execution environment in Eclipse, and set the compiler compliance level to Java 7. I can compile the following piece of code through command line using the javac that comes with JDK 7. java.util.Map java.util.HashMap But, Eclipse gives the following error messages. Incorrect number of arguments for type HashMap; it cannot be parameterized with arguments Try.java /TryJava7/src line 7 Java Problem Syntax error on token "<", ? expected after this token Try.java /TryJava7/src line 7 Java Problem Even though I've set the compliance level of the compiler to Java 7, it looks like Eclipse doesn't understand Java7 syntax yet. Is it possible to play with Java 7 in Eclipse? The following is the content of .classpath. And, the following is the content of .settings/org.eclipse.jdt.core.prefs.
How does a ArrayList's contains() method evaluate objects? Say I create one object and add it to my ArrayList. If I then create another object with exactly the same constructor input, will the contains() method evaluate the two objects to be the same? Assume the constructor doesn't do anything funny with the input, and the variables stored in both objects are identical. true or false? Is this how the class should be implemented to have contains() return true?
Trusting all certificates using HttpClient over HTTPS Recently posted a question regarding the HttpClient over Https (found here). I've made some headway, but I've run into new issues. As with my last problem, I can't seem to find an example anywhere that works for me. Basically, I want my client to accept any certificate (because I'm only ever pointing to one server) but I keep getting a javax.net.ssl.SSLException: Not trusted server certificate exception. So this is what I have: And here's the error I'm getting:
In laymans terms, what does 'static' mean in Java? I have been told several definitions for it, looked on Wikipedia, but as a beginner to Java I'm still not sure what it means. Anybody fluent in Java and idiot?
Building vs. Compiling (Java) Thinking that the answer to this is pretty obvious but here it goes: When I am working on a small project for school (in java) I compile it. On my coop we are using ant to build our project. I think that compiling is a subset of building. Is this correct? What is the difference between building and compiling? Related: What is the difference between compiling and building?
Why doesn't Java Map extends Collection? I was surprised by the fact that Map<?,?> is not a Collection<?>. I thought it'd make a LOT of sense if it was declared as such: After all, a Map<K,V> is a collection of Map.Entry<K,V>, isn't it? So is there a good reason why it's not implemented as such? Thanks to Cletus for a most authoritative answer, but I'm still wondering why, if you can already view a Map<K,V> as Set<Map.Entries<K,V>> (via entrySet()), it doesn't just extend that interface instead. If a Map is a Collection, what are the elements? The only reasonable answer is "Key-value pairs" Exactly, interface Map<K,V> extends Set<Map.Entry<K,V>> would be great! but this provides a very limited (and not particularly useful) Map abstraction. But if that's the case then why is entrySet specified by the interface? It must be useful somehow (and I think it's easy to argue for that position!). You can't ask what value a given key maps to, nor can you delete the entry for a given key without knowing what value it maps to. I'm not saying that that's all there is to it to Map! It can and should keep all the other methods (except entrySet, which is redundant now)!
Google Guice vs. JSR-299 CDI / Weld Weld, the JSR-299 Contexts and Dependency Injection reference implementation, considers itself as a kind of successor of Spring and Guice. CDI was influenced by a number of existing Java frameworks, including Seam, Guice and Spring. However, CDI has its own, very distinct, character: more typesafe than Seam, more stateful and less XML-centric than Spring, more web and enterprise-application capable than Guice. But it couldn't have been any of these without inspiration from the frameworks mentioned and lots of collaboration and hard work by the JSR-299 Expert Group (EG). http://docs.jboss.org/weld/reference/latest/en-US/html/1.html What makes Weld more capable for enterprise application compared to Guice? Are there any advantages or disadvantages compared to Guice? What do you think about Guice AOP compared to Weld interceptors? What about performance? My choice In the end I decided to use Guice because I like the clean programming model which comes almost without annotations besides @Inject by default. It is much easier to use external libs with Guice than with CDI. AOP is also pretty simple with Guice.
How to get year, month, day, hours, minutes, seconds and milliseconds of the current moment in Java? How can I get the year, month, day, hours, minutes, seconds and milliseconds of the current moment in Java? I would like to have them as Strings.
Rounding a double to turn it into an int (java) Right now I'm trying this: where n is a double but it's not working. What am I doing wrong?
Make $JAVA_HOME easily changable in Ubuntu In Ubuntu, I'd like to switch my JAVA_HOME environment variable back and forth between Java 5 and 6. I open a terminal and type in the following to set the JAVA_HOME environment variable: And in that same terminal window, I type the following to check that the environment variable has been updated: And I see /usr/lib/jvm/java-1.5.0-sun which is what I'm expecting to see. In addition, I modify ~/.profile and set the JAVA_HOME environment variable to /usr/lib/jvm/java-1.5.0-sun. And now for the problem--when I open a new terminal window and I check my JAVA_HOME environment variable by typing in echo $JAVA_HOME I see that my JAVA_HOME environment variable has been reverted back to Java 6. When I reboot my machine (or log out and back in, I suppose) the JAVA_HOME environment variable is set to Java 5 (presumably because of the modification I made in my ~/.profile). Is there a way around this so that I can change my JAVA_HOME environment without having to log out and back in (AND make that environment variable change stick in all new terminal windows)?
XSS prevention in JSP/Servlet web application How can I prevent XSS attacks in a JSP/Servlet web application?
Java - How to find the redirected url of a url? I am accessing web pages through java as follows: But in some cases, a url redirects to another url. So I want to know the url to which the previous url redirected. Below are the header fields that I got as a response: So at present, I am constructing the redirected url from the value of the Set-Cookie header field. In the above case, the redirected url is copenhagen.craigslist.org Is there any standard way through which I can determine which url the particular url is going to redirect. I know that when a url redirects to other url, the server sends an intermediate response containing a Location header field that tells the redirected url but I am not receiving that intermediate response through the url.openConnection(); method.
What is the use of interface constants? I am learning Java and just found that the Interface can have fields, which are public static and final. I haven't seen any examples of these so far. What are some of the use cases of these Interface Constants and can I see some in the Java Standard Library?
Is it bad to explicitly compare against boolean constants e.g. if (b == false) in Java? Is it bad to write: ... ... Is it always better to instead write: ... ... Presumably there is no difference in performance (or is there?), but how do you weigh the explicitness, the conciseness, the clarity, the readability, etc between the two? Update To limit the subjectivity, I'd also appreciate any quotes from authoritative coding style guidelines over which is always preferable or which to use when. Note: the variable name b is just used as an example, ala foo and bar.
Launching Google Maps Directions via an intent on Android My app needs to show Google Maps directions from A to B, but I don't want to put the Google Maps into my application - instead, I want to launch it using an Intent. Is this possible? If yes, how?
How to detect a loop in a linked list? Say you have a linked list structure in Java. It's made up of Nodes: some user data and each Node points to the next node, except for the last Node, which has null for next. Say there is a possibility that the list can contain a loop - i.e. the final Node, instead of having a null, has a reference to one of the nodes in the list which came before it. What's the best way of writing which would return true if the given Node is the first of a list with a loop, and false otherwise? How could you write so that it takes a constant amount of space and a reasonable amount of time? Here's a picture of what a list with a loop looks like:
Java Concurrency: CAS vs Locking I'm reading the Book Java Concurrency in Practice. In chapter 15, they are talking about the nonblocking algorithms and the compare-and-swap (CAS) method. It is written that CAS perform much better than the locking methods. I want to ask the people who already worked with both of these concepts and would like to hear when you are preferring which one of these concepts? Is it really so much faster? For me, the usage of locks is much clearer and easier to understand and maybe even better to maintain (please correct me if I am wrong). Should we really focus on creating our concurrent code related to CAS than locks to get a better performance boost or is sustainability more important? I know there is maybe not a strict rule when to use what. But I just would like to hear some opinions, experiences with the new concept of CAS.
Practical advice on using Jersey and Guice for RESTful service From what I can find online, the state of the art for Guice + Jersey integration has stagnated since 2008 when it appears both teams reached an impasse. The crux of the issue is that JAX-RS annotations perform field and method injection and this doesn't play nicely with Guice's own dependency injection. A few examples which I've found don't go far enough to elucidate: Iqbalyusuf's post on Jersey + Guice on Google App Engine Java suffers from a lot of boilerplate (manually getting and calling the injector). I want binding and injection should happen behind the scenes via Guice annotations. Jonathan Curran's article Creating a RESTful service with Jersey, Guice, and JSR-250 gave me hope because it's much more current (2010), but went no further than showing how to start up a Jersey service inside of a Guice ServletModule. However, there are no examples of doing any real dependency injection. I suppose that was left as an exercise for the reader. Curran's post may in fact be the correct first step towards wiring up Guice and Jersey and so I plan on starting with that. tantalizingly James Strachan writes: JAX-RS works well with dependency injection frameworks such as Spring, Guice, GuiceyFruit or JBossMC - you can basically pick whichever one you prefer. But I see no evidence that is true from a practitioner's point of view. What I find lacking are practical examples and explanations on how to combine JAX-RS and Guice annotations. For instance: I believe I cannot use constructor injection with any resource as Jersey wants to control this I'm uncertain whether I can combine @Inject with @PathParam, @QueryParam, et al. How to use injection in a MessageBodyWriter implementation Does anyone have examples, preferably with source, of non-trivial application which combines Jersey and Guice without sacrificing one or the other in the process? I'm keeping on this road regardless, but the bits and pieces on the Jersey and Guice lists makes me think I'm repeating the work of others who came before me.
How to quit a java app from within the program What's the best way to quit a Java application with code?
Using Pairs or 2-tuples in Java My Hashtable in Java would benefit from a value having a tuple structure. What data structure can I use in Java to do that?
Java: when to use static methods I am wondering when to use static methods? Say if I have a class with a few getters and setters, a method or two, and I want those methods only to be invokable on an instance object of the class. Does this mean I should use a static method? e.g or (is this the static way?) I'm rather confused!
Distributed sequence number generation? I've generally implemented sequence number generation using database sequences in the past. e.g. Using Postgres SERIAL type http://www.neilconway.org/docs/sequences/ I'm curious though as how to generate sequence numbers for large distributed systems where there is no database. Does anybody have any experience or suggestions of a best practice for achieving sequence number generation in a thread safe manner for multiple clients?
How do you know a variable type in java? Let's say I declare a variable: And I want to know what type it is, i.e., the output should be java.lang.String How do I do this?
How to find an available port? I want to start a server which listen to a port. I can specify port explicitly and it works. But I would like to find a port in an automatic way. In this respect I have two questions. In which range of port numbers should I search for? (I used ports 12345, 12346, and 12347 and it was fine). How can I find out if a given port is not occupied by another software?
Naming convention for utility classes in Java When writing utility classes in Java, what are some good guidelines to follow? Should packges be "util" or "utils"? Is it ClassUtil or ClassUtils? When is a class a "Helper" or a "Utility"? Utility or Utilities? Or do you use a mixture of them? The standard Java library uses both Utils and Utilities: javax.swing.Utilities javax.print.attribute.AttributeSetUtilities javax.swing.plaf.basic.BasicGraphicsUtils Apache uses a variety of Util and Utils, although mostly Utils: org.apache.commons.modeler.util.DomUtil org.apache.commons.modeler.util.IntrospectionUtils org.apache.commons.io.FileSystemUtils org.apache.lucene.wordnet.AnalyzerUtil org.apache.lucene.util.ArrayUtil org.apache.lucene.xmlparser.DOMUtils Spring uses a lot of Helper and Utils classes: org.springframework.web.util.UrlPathHelper org.springframework.core.ReflectiveVisitorHelper org.springframework.core.NestedExceptionUtils org.springframework.util.NumberUtils So, how do you name your utility classes?
Catching java.lang.OutOfMemoryError? Documentation for java.lang.Error says: An Error is a subclass of Throwable that indicates serious problems that a reasonable application should not try to catch But as java.lang.Error is a subclass of java.lang.Throwable, I can catch this type of Throwable. I understand why it's not good idea to catch this sort of exception. As far as I understand, if we decide to catch it, the catch handler should not allocate any memory by itself. Otherwise OutOfMemoryError will be thrown again. So, my question is: Is there any real word scenarios when catching java.lang.OutOfMemoryError may be a good idea? If we decide to catch java.lang.OutOfMemoryError, how can we sure that catch handler doesn't allocate any memory by itself (any tools or best practices)?
Is there anyway to exclude artifacts inherited from a parent POM? Artifacts from dependencies can be excluded by declaring an <exclusions> element inside a <dependency> But in this case it's needed to exclude an artifact inherited from a parent project. An excerpt of the POM under discussion follows: base artifact, depends on javax.mail:mail-1.4.jar, and ALL-DEPS depends on another version of the same library. Due to the fact that mail.jar from ALL-DEPS exist on the execution environment, although not exported, collides with the mail.jar that exists on the parent, which is scoped as compile. A solution could be to rid off mail.jar from the parent POM, but most of the projects that inherit base, need it (as is a transtive dependency for log4j). So What I would like to do is to simply exclude parent's library from the child project, as it could be done if base was a dependency and not the parent pom:
Get query from java.sql.PreparedStatement In my code I am using java.sql.PreparedStatement. I then execute the setString() method to populate the wildcards of the prepared statement. Is there a way for me to retrieve (and print out) the final query before the executeQuery() method is called and the query is executed? I Just want this for debugging purposes.
Why would I use Scala/Lift over Java/Spring? I know this question is a bit open but I have been looking at Scala/Lift as an alternative to Java/Spring and I wonder what are the real advantages that Scala/Lift has over it. From my perspective and experience, Java Annotations and Spring really minimizes the amount of coding that you have to do for an application. Does Scala/Lift improve upon that?
How can I make a method return an argument that was passed to it? Consider a method signature like: Can Mockito help return the same string that the method received?
How to ignore SSL certificate errors in Apache HttpClient 4.0 How do I bypass invalid SSL certificate errors with Apache HttpClient 4.0?
What is the difference between the add and offer methods in a Queue in Java? Take the PriorityQueue for example http://java.sun.com/j2se/1.5.0/docs/api/java/util/PriorityQueue.html#offer(E) Can anyone give me an example of a Queue where the add and offer methods are different? According to the Collection doc, the add method will often seek to ensure that an element exists within the Collection rather than adding duplicates. So my question is, what is the difference between the add and offer methods? Is it that the offer method will add duplicates regardless? (I doubt that it is because if a Collection should only have distinct elements this would circumvent that). EDIT: In a PriorityQueue the add and offer methods are the same method (see my answer below). Can anyone give me an example of a class where the add and offer methods are different?
Why is Go so slow (compared to Java)? As we can see from The Computer Language Benchmarks Game: Go is on average 10x slower than C Go is 3x slower than Java !? How can this be, bearing in mind that Go compiler produces native code for execution? Immature compilers for Go? Or there is some intrinsic problem with the Go language? EDIT: Most answers deny intrinsic slowness of Go languge, claiming the problem resides in immature compilers. Therefore I've made some own tests to calculate Fibonacci numbers: Iterative algorithm runs in Go (freebsd,6g) with the same speed as in C (with O3 option). The dull recursive one runs in Go 2 times slower than in C (with -O3 option; with -O0 - the same). But I haven't seen 10x fall as in the Benchmarks Game.
Java REST implementation: Jersey vs CXF What do you think is the advantages/disadvantages between this two libraries? Which of these two are best suited for production environment? By the way I will be using JSON instead of XML. I also would like to know what library is most supported by the community e.g. tutorials, documentation.
What is null in Java? What is null? Is null an instance of anything? What set does null belong to? How is it represented in the memory?
Converting a string to an integer on Android How do I convert a string into an integer? I have a textbox I have the user enter a number into: And the value is assigned to the string hello. I want to convert it to a integer so I can get the number they typed; it will be used later on in code. Is there a way to get the EditText to a integer? That would skip the middle man. If not, string to integer will be just fine.
Why would an Enum implement an Interface? I just found out that Java allows enums to implement an interface. What would be a good use case for that?
Why do we need break after case statements? Why doesn't the compiler automatically put break statements after each code block in the switch? Is it for historical reasons? When would you want multiple code blocks to execute?
Is it possible to set a custom font for entire of application? I need to use certain font for my entire application. I have .ttf file for the same. Is it possible to set this as default font, at application start up and then use it elsewhere in the application? When set, how do I use it in my layout XMLs?
Get Maven artifact version at runtime I have noticed that in a Maven artifact's JAR, the project.version attribute is included in two files: Is there a recommended way to read this version at runtime?
How to change the size of the font of a JLabel to take the maximum size I have a JLabel in a Container. The defaut size of the font is very small. I would like that the text of the JLabel to take the maximum size. How can I do that ? Thanks :)
Create a simple HTTP server with Java? What's the easiest way to create a simple HTTP server with Java? Are there any libraries in commons to facilitate this? I only need to respond to GET/POST, and I can't use an application server. What's the easiest way to accomplish this?
What is PECS (Producer Extends Consumer Super)? I came across PECS (short for Producer extends and Consumer super) while reading up on generics. Can someone explain to me how to use PECS to resolve confusion between extends and super?
Determine file creation date in Java There is another similar question to mine on StackOverflow (How to get creation date of a file in Java), but the answer isn't really there as the OP had a different need that could be solved via other mechanisms. I am trying to create a list of the files in a directory that can be sorted by age, hence the need for the file creation date. I haven't located any good way to do this after much trawling of the web. Is there a mechanism for getting file creation dates? BTW, currently on a Windows system, may need this to work on a Linux system as well. Also, I can't guarantee that a file naming convention would be followed where the creation date/time is embedded in the name.
Date object to Calendar [Java] I have a class Movie in it i have a start Date, a duration and a stop Date. Start and stop Date are Date Objects (private Date startDate ...) (It's an assignment so i cant change that) now i want to automatically calculate the stopDate by adding the duration (in min) to the startDate. By my knowledge working with the time manipulating functions of Date is deprecated hence bad practice but on the other side i see no way to convert the Date object to a calendar object in order to manipulate the time and reconvert it to a Date object. Is there a way? And if there is what would be best practice Thanks in advance Samuel
What is the difference between Java RMI and RPC? What is the actual difference between Java RMI and RPC? I have read in some places that RMI uses Objects?
Java Integer compareTo() - why use comparison vs. subtraction? I've found that java.lang.Integer implementation of compareTo method looks as follows: The question is why use comparison instead of subtraction:
Why is there no Constant feature in Java? I was trying to identify the reason behind constants in Java I have learned that Java allows us to declare constants by using final keyword. My question is why didn't Java introduce a Constant (const) feature. Since many people say it has come from C++, in C++ we have const keyword. Please share your thoughts.
How to pass an object from one activity to another on Android I am trying to work on sending an object of my customer class from one Activity and display it in another Activity. The code for the customer class: I want to send its object from one Activity to another and then display the data on the other Activity. How can I achieve that?
Output in a table format in Java's System.out I'm getting results from a database and want to output the data as a table in Java's standard output I've tried using \t but the first column I want is very variable in length. Is there a way to display this in a nice table like output?
Is List a subclass of List? Why aren't Java's generics implicitly polymorphic? I'm a bit confused about how Java generics handle inheritance / polymorphism. Assume the following hierarchy - Animal (Parent) Dog - Cat (Children) So suppose I have a method doSomething(List<Animal> animals). By all the rules of inheritance and polymorphism, I would assume that a List<Dog> is a List<Animal> and a List<Cat> is a List<Animal> - and so either one could be passed to this method. Not so. If I want to achieve this behavior, I have to explicitly tell the method to accept a list of any subset of Animal by saying doSomething(List<? extends Animal> animals). I understand that this is Java's behavior. My question is why? Why is polymorphism generally implicit, but when it comes to generics it must be specified?
Alternatives to JSP for Spring MVC view layer I'm looking to create a new app from scratch and will probably use Spring MVC and possibly Spring Web Flow. The projects created by Spring Roo use Spring MVC and optionally Web Flow. What are some good alternatives for view technology, or is JSP with Spring and JSTL taglibs and jQuery the way to go?
How is Java platform-independent when it needs a JVM to run? I just started learning Java and I'm confused about the topic of platform independence. Doesn't "independent" imply that Java code should run on any machine and need no special software to be installed? Yet the JVM needs to be present in the machine. For example, we need to have the Turbo C Compiler in order to compile C/C++ source code and then execute it. The machine has to have the C compiler. Could somebody please what is meant when Java is described as "platform independent"?
Map enum in JPA with fixed values? I'm looking for the different ways to map an enum using JPA. I especially want to set the integer value of each enum entry and to save only the integer value. the enum to map : A simple solution is to use the Enumerated annotation with EnumType.ORDINAL: But in this case JPA maps the enum index (0,1,2) and not the value I want (100,200,300). Th two solutions I found do not seem simple... First Solution A solution, proposed here, uses @PrePersist and @PostLoad to convert the enum to an other field and mark the enum field as transient: Second Solution The second solution proposed here proposed a generic conversion object, but still seems heavy and hibernate-oriented (@Type doesn't seem to exist in Java EE): Is there any other solutions ? I've several ideas in mind but I don't know if they exist in JPA: use the setter and getter methods of right member of Authority Class when loading and saving the Authority object an equivalent idea would be to tell JPA what are the methods of Right enum to convert enum to int and int to enum Because I'm using Spring, is there any way to tell JPA to use a specific converter (RightEditor) ?
How can I write an anonymous function in Java? Is it even possible?
How can I use "." as the delimiter with String.split() in java What I am trying to do is read a .java file, and pick out all of the identifiers and store them in a list. My problem is with the .split() method. If you run this code the way it is, you will get ArrayOutOfBounds, but if you change the delimiter from "." to anything else, the code works. But I need to lines parsed by "." so is there another way I could accomplish this? hasNext println getName java.io.IOException remove java.util readLine listIterator log trim close add toString java.io.FileReader length java.io.BufferedReader getLogger charAt size next readFile contains java.io.FileNotFoundException split makeReserved PROBLEM IS HERE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! CHANGE THIS AND IT WILL WORK TESTING TO SEE IF IT WORKED NAME OF INPUT FILE
Developing for Android in Eclipse: R.java not regenerating I've found out that my R.java is never updated, so it doesn't contain information about my new resources, so I decided to delete it and thought that Eclipse would generate a new one. But that didn't happen, and I don't have R.java now. How can I regenerate one? I'm using Windows 7. From one of the comments: "Doing Project -> Clean is what caused the problem for me. Cleaning deletes R.java...and for whatever reason the plugin is not regenerating the file."
What does the Java assert keyword do, and when should it be used? What are some real life examples to understand the key role of assertions?
ExecutorService that interrupts tasks after a timeout I'm looking for an ExecutorService implementation that can be provided with a timeout. Tasks that are submitted to the ExecutorService are interrupted if they take longer than the timeout to run. Implementing such a beast isn't such a difficult task, but I'm wondering if anybody knows of an existing implementation. Here's what I came up with based on some of the discussion below. Any comments? interrupt cancel remove put shutdown java.util.concurrent newSingleThreadScheduledExecutor java.util.List schedule shutdownNow
ArrayList initialization equivalent to array initialization I am aware that you can initialize an array during instantiation as follows: Is there a way to do the same thing with an ArrayList? Or must I add the contents individually with array.add()?
Java Compare Two Lists I have two lists ( not java lists, you can say two columns) For example I'd like a method that returns how many elements are same. For this example it should be 3 and it should return me similar values of both list and different values too. Should I use hashmap if yes then what method to get my result? Please help P.S: It is not a school assignment :) So if you just guide me it will be enough
Why use a singleton instead of static methods? I've never found good answers to these simple questions about helper/utility classes: Why would I create a singleton (stateless) instead of using static methods? Why would an object instance be needed if an object has no state?
How to get the first non-null value in Java? Is there a Java equivalent of SQL's COALESCE function? That is, is there any way to return the first non-null value of several variables? e.g. I want to somehow have a statement that will return the first non-null value of a, b, and c - in this case, it would return b, or 4.4. (Something like the sql method - return COALESCE(a,b,c)). I know that I can do it explicitly with something like: But I wondered if there was any built-in, accepted function to accomplish this.
What is Dispatcher Servlet in Spring? In this image (which I got from here), HTTP request sends something to Dispatcher Servlet. My Question is what does Dispatcher Servlet do? Is it something like getting the information thrown from the web page and throwing it to the controller?
What is a raw type and why shouldn't we use it? Questions: What are raw types in Java, and why do I often hear that they shouldn't be used in new code? What is the alternative if we can't use raw types, and how is it better?
Why is System.arraycopy native in Java? I was surprised to see in the Java source that System.arraycopy is a native method. Of course the reason is because it's faster. But what native tricks is the code able to employ that make it faster? Why not just loop over the original array and copy each pointer to the new array - surely this isn't that slow and cumbersome?
Difference between HashSet and HashMap? Apart from the fact that HashSet does not allow duplicate values, what is the difference between HashMap and Hashset? I mean implementation wise? It's a little bit vague because both use hash tables to store values.
How can I convert JSON to a HashMap using Gson? I'm requesting data from a server which returns data in the JSON format. Casting a HashMap into JSON when making the request wasn't hard at all but the other way seems to be a little tricky. The JSON response looks like this: What way would be easiest to access this data? I'm using the GSON module.
Why must wait() always be in synchronized block We all know that in order to invoke Object.wait(), this call must be placed in synchronized block, otherwise an IllegalMonitorStateException is thrown. But what's the reason for making this restriction? I know that wait() releases the monitor, but why do we need to explicitly acquire the monitor by making particular block synchronized and then release the monitor by calling wait()? What is the potential damage if it was possible to invoke wait() outside a synchronized block, retaining it's semantics - suspending the caller thread?
Why should Java ThreadLocal variables be static I was reading the JavaDoc for Threadlocal here http://java.sun.com/j2se/1.5.0/docs/api/java/lang/ThreadLocal.html and it says "ThreadLocal instances are typically private static fields in classes that wish to associate state with a thread (e.g., a user ID or Transaction ID). " But my question is why did they choose to make it static (typically) - it makes things a bit confusing to have "per thread" state but the fields are static?
Sort ArrayList of custom Objects by property I read about sorting ArrayLists using a Comparator but in all of the examples people used compareTo which according to some research is a method for Strings. I wanted to sort an ArrayList of custom objects by one of their properties: a Date object (getStartDay()). Normally I compare them by item1.getStartDate().before(item2.getStartDate()) so I was wondering whether I could write something like:
Is there a unique Android device ID? Do Android devices have a unique ID, and if so, what is a simple way to access it using Java?
Java: How to read a text file I want to read a text file containing space separated values. Values are integers. How can I read it and put it in an array list? Here is an example of contents of the text file: I want to have it in an arraylist as [1, 62, 4, 55, 5, 6, 77]. How can I do it in Java?
Avoiding instanceof in Java Having a chain of "instanceof" operations is considered a "code smell". The standard answer is "use polymorphism". How would I do it in this case? There are a number of subclasses of a base class; none of them are under my control. An analogous situation would be with the Java classes Integer, Double, BigDecimal etc. I do have control over NumberStuff and so on. I don't want to use many lines of code where a few lines would do. (Sometimes I make a HashMap mapping Integer.class to an instance of IntegerStuff, BigDecimal.class to an instance of BigDecimalStuff etc. But today I want something simpler.) I'd like something as simple as this: But Java just doesn't work that way. I'd like to use static methods when formatting. The things I'm formatting are composite, where a Thing1 can contain an array Thing2s and a Thing2 can contain an array of Thing1s. I had a problem when I implemented my formatters like this: format Yes, I know the HashMap and a bit more code can fix that too. But the "instanceof" seems so readable and maintainable by comparison. Is there anything simple but not smelly? Note added 5/10/2010: It turns out that new subclasses will probably be added in the future, and my existing code will have to handle them gracefully. The HashMap on Class won't work in that case because the Class won't be found. A chain of if statements, starting with the most specific and ending with the most general, is probably the best after all: Handle all the methods and properties of SubClass1 Handle all the methods and properties of SubClass2 Unknown class but it implements Interface3 so handle those methods and properties likewise. May want to also handle case of object that implements both interfaces. New (unknown) subclass; do what I can with the base class
Using java.net.URLConnection to fire and handle HTTP requests Use of java.net.URLConnection is asked about pretty often here, and the Oracle tutorial is too concise about it. That tutorial basically only shows how to fire a GET request and read the response. It doesn't explain anywhere how to use it to among others perform a POST request, set request headers, read response headers, deal with cookies, submit a HTML form, upload a file, etc. So, how can I use java.net.URLConnection to fire and handle "advanced" HTTP requests?
Check orientation on Android phone How can I check if the Android phone is in Landscape or Portrait?
How to remove leading zeros from alphanumeric text? I've seen questions on how to prefix zeros here in SO. But not the other way! Can you guys suggest me how to remove the leading zeros in alphanumeric text? Are there any built-in APIs or do I need to write a method to trim the leading zeros? Example:
Implementing two interfaces in a class with same method. Which interface method is overridden? Two interfaces with same method names and signatures. But implemented by a single class then how the compiler will identify the which method is for which interface? Ex: from which interface A or B
Constructor in an Interface? I know it's not possible to define a constructor in an interface. But I'm wondering why, because I think it could be very useful. So you could be sure that some fields in a class are defined for every implementation of this interface. For example consider the following message class: some implementation for sending the mssage to the receiver If a define an interface for this class so that I can have more classes which implement the message interface, I can only define the send method and not the constructor. So how can I ensure that every implementation of this class really has an receiver set? If I use a method like setReceiver(String receiver) I can't be sure that this method is really called. In the constructor I could ensure it.
Create a string with n characters Is there a way in java to create a string with a specified number of a specified character? In my case I would need to create a string with 10 spaces. My current code is: Is there a better way to accomplish the same thing. In particular I'd like something that is fast (in terms of execution).
Does Java have something like C#'s ref and out keywords? Something like the following: ref example: prints "def" out example: prints "def"
Round a double to 2 decimal places If the value is 200.3456, it should be formatted to 200.34. If it is 200, then it should be 200.00.
Is it bad practice to use Reflection in Unit testing? During the last years I always thought that in Java, Reflection is widely used during Unit testing. Since some of the variables/methods which have to be checked are private, it is somehow necessary to read the values of them. I always thought that the Reflection API is also used for this purpose. Last week i had to test some packages and therefore write some JUnit tests. As always i used Reflection to access private fields and methods. But my supervisor who checked the code wasn't really happy with that and told me that the Reflection API wasn't meant to use for such "hacking". Instead he suggested to modifiy the visibility in the production code. Is it really bad practice to use Reflection? I can't really believe that- Edit: I should have mentioned that i was required that all tests are in a separate package called test (so using protected visibilty e.g. wasn't a possible solution too)
Difference between >>> and >> What is the difference between the operators >>> and >> in Java?
Java Interfaces/Implementation naming convention How do you name different classes / interfaces you create? Sometimes I don't have implementation information to add to the implementation name - like interface FileHandler and class SqlFileHandler. When this happens I usually name the interface in the "normal" name, like Truck and name the actual class TruckClass. How do you name interfaces and classes in this regard?
Can a constructor in Java be private? Can a constructor be private? How is a private constructor useful?
How does Java order items in a HashMap or a HashTable? I was wondering how Java orders items in the Map (HashMap or Hashtable) when they are added. Are the keys ordered by the hashcode, memory reference or by allocation precedence...? It's because I've noticed same pairs in the Map are not always in the same order
Java code To convert byte to Hexadecimal I have an array of bytes. I want each byte String of that array to be converted to its corresponding hexadecimal values. Is there any function in Java to convert a byte array to Hexadecimal ?
Java: Difference between PrintStream and PrintWriter What is the difference between PrintStream and PrintWriter? They have many methods in common due to which I often mix these two classes up. Moreover, I think we can use them for exactly the same things. But there has to be a difference, otherwise, there would have been only one class. I have searched the archives, but couldn't find this question.
How to use an output parameter in Java? Could someone please give me some sample code that uses an output parameter in function? I've tried to Google it but just found it just in functions. I'd like to use this output value in another function. The code I am developing intended to be run in Android.
Junit before class ( non static ) Are there any best practices to get Junit execute a function once in a test file , and it should also not be static. like @BeforeClass on non static function? Here is an ugly solution : do once block well this is something i dont want to do , and i am looking for an integrated junit solution.
What is super T> syntax? I'm having trouble understanding the following syntax: I see that class SortedList extends LinkedList. I just don't know what means. My understanding of it so far is that type T must be a type that implements Comparable...but what is < ? super T >?
How to return 2 values from a Java method? I am trying to return 2 values from a Java method but I get these errors. Here is my code: Method code Main method code Error: Java Result: 1
Create whole path automatically when writing to a new file I want to write a new file with the FileWriter. I use it like this: Now dir1 and dir2 currently don't exist. I want Java to create them automatically if they aren't already there. Actually Java should set up the whole file path if not already existing. How can I achieve this?
How to establish a connection pool in JDBC? Can anybody provide examples or links on how to establish a JDBC connection pool? From searching google I see many different ways of doing this and it is rather confusing. Ultimately I need the code to return a java.sql.Connection object, but I am having trouble getting started..any suggestions welcome. Update: Doesn't javax.sql or java.sql have pooled connection implementations? Why wouldn't it be best to use these?
How to use Comparator in Java to sort I learned how to use the comparable but I'm having difficulty with the Comparator. I am having a error in my code: Here is my code: setprice setid setinfo java.util.Comparator println sort add size java.util.ArrayList get java.util.Collections I believe it has to do something with the casting in the compare method but I was playing around with it and still could not find the solution
Connect Java to a MySQL database How do you connect to a MySQL database in Java?
What is the difference between Spring, Struts, Hibernate, JavaServer Faces, Tapestry? May I know what is the difference between:- Spring Struts Struts 2 Hibernate JavaServer Faces JavaServer Pages Tapestry Are these technologies/framework complementary to each other? Or they are alternatives to each other (after I use one of them, then I don't need to use the other)? Thanks.
How to add new elements to an array? I have the following code: Those two appends are not compiling. How would that work correctly?
How do I parse JSON from a Java HTTPResponse? I have an HttpResponse object for a web request I just made. The response is in the JSON format, so I need to parse it. I can do it in an absurdly complex way, but it seems like there must be a better way. Is this really the best I can do? some response object I'm on Android if that makes any difference.
Building big, immutable objects without using constructors having long parameter lists I have some big (more than 3 fields) Objects which can and should be immutable. Every time I run into that case i tend to create constructor abominations with long parameter lists. It doesn't feel right, is hard to use and readability suffers. It is even worse if the fields are some sort of collection type like lists. A simple addSibling(S s) would ease the object creation so much but renders the object mutable. What do you guys use in such cases? I'm on Scala and Java, but i think the problem is language agnostic as long as the language is object oriented. Solutions I can think of: "Constructor abominations with long parameter lists" The Builder Pattern Thanks for your input!
Difference between try-finally and try-catch What's the difference between and Does something with throwable, logs it, or handles it. I like the second version better because it gives me access to the Throwable. Is there any logical difference or a preferred convention between the two variations? Also, is there a way to access the exception from the finally clause?
How can I tell jaxb / Maven to generate multiple schema packages? Example: What happened: Maven executes the the first plugin. Then deletes the target folder and creates the second package, which then is visible. I tried to set target/somedir1 for the first configuration and target/somedir2 for the second configuration. But the behavior does not not change? Any ideas? I do not want to generate the packages directly in the src/main/java folder, because these packages are genereated and should not be mixed with manual created classes.
Difference between Java SE/EE/ME? Which one should I install when I want to start learning Java? I'm going to start with some basics, so I will write simple programs that create files, directories, edit XML files and so on, nothing too complex for now. I guess Java SE (Standard Edition) is the one I should install on my Windows 7 desktop. I already have Komodo IDE which I will use to write the Java code.
How can I hash a password in Java? I need to hash passwords for storage in a database. How can I do this in Java? I was hoping to take the plain text password, add a random salt, then store the salt and the hashed password in the database. Then when a user wanted to log in, I could take their submitted password, add the random salt from their account information, hash it and see if it equates to the stored hash password with their account information.
How to generate a random String in Java I have an object called Student, and it has studentName, studentId, studentAddress, etc. For the studentId, I have to generate random string consist of seven numeric charaters, eg. And I have to make sure that there is no duplicate id.
TreeMap sort by value I want to write an comparator that will let me sort TreeMap by value instead of the default natural sorting. i tried something like this, but can't find out what went wrong: println getKey java.util getValue put entrySet I guess what am i asking is what controls what gets passed to comparator function, can i get an Map.Entry passed to comparator?
Viewing complete strings while debugging in Eclipse While debugging Java code, Strings in the views "Variables" and "Expressions" show up only till a certain length, after which Eclipse shows "..." Is there any way to inspect the entire string? (This eases the pain of adding logging statements for debugging everywhere)
Java SecurityException: signer information does not match I recompiled my classes as usual, and suddenly got the following error message. Why? How can I fix it?
How to render PDF in Android In my application I will receive a byte stream and convert it to a pdf file in the phone memory. How do I render that to a pdf? And show it on an activity?
In JPA 2, using a CriteriaQuery, how to count results I am rather new to JPA 2 and it's CriteriaBuilder / CriteriaQuery API: CriteriaQuery javadoc CriteriaQuery in the Java EE 6 tutorial I would like to count the results of a CriteriaQuery without actually retrieving them. Is that possible, I did not find any such method, the only way would be to do this: initialize predicates here And that can't be the proper way to do it... Is there a solution?
How do I create a file and write to it in Java? What's the simplest way to create and write to a (text) file in Java?
Is it a bad idea if equals(null) throws NullPointerException instead? The contract of equals with regards to null, is as follows: For any non-null reference value x, x.equals(null) should return false. This is rather peculiar, because if o1 != null and o2 == null, then we have: returns false throws NullPointerException The fact that o2.equals(o1) throws NullPointerException is a good thing, because it alerts us of programmer error. And yet, that error would not be catched if for various reasons we just switched it around to o1.equals(o2), which would just "silently fail" instead. So the questions are: Why is it a good idea that o1.equals(o2) should return false instead of throwing NullPointerException? Would it be a bad idea if wherever possible we rewrite the contract so that anyObject.equals(null) always throw NullPointerException instead? On comparison with Comparable In contrast, this is what the Comparable contract says: Note that null is not an instance of any class, and e.compareTo(null) should throw a NullPointerException even though e.equals(null) returns false. If NullPointerException is appropriate for compareTo, why isn't it for equals? Related questions Comparable and Comparator contract with regards to null A purely semantical argument These are the actual words in the Object.equals(Object obj) documentation: Indicates whether some other object is "equal to" this one. And what is an object? JLS 4.3.1 Objects An object is a class instance or an array. The reference values (often just references) are pointers to these objects, and a special null reference, which refers to no object. My argument from this angle is really simple. equals tests whether some other object is "equal to" this null reference gives no other object for the test Therefore, equals(null) should throw NullPointerException
Keystore change passwords I currently have a keystore, with a particular password that only I should know. I now need to give access to that keystore to someone else, so I would like to either: 1) Change the password, so I can share it with others and let them sign 2) Create a different password and allow them to sign with it. Is this possible? and - if yes - how?
Difference between HashMap, LinkedHashMap and TreeMap What is the difference between HashMap, LinkedHashMap and TreeMap in Java? I don't see any difference in the output as all the three has keySet and values. What are Hashtables?
How to set time zone of a java.util.Date? I have parsed a java.util.Date from a String but it is setting the local time zone as the time zone of the date object. The time zone is not specified in the String from which Date is parsed. I want to set a specific time zone of the date object. How can I do that?
Exercises to improve my Java programming skills I have learned basics of Java but want to practice more. I was looking via Google and couldn't find many beginner level problems that I can solve using Java. Any suggestions?
Accept server's self-signed ssl certificate in Java client It looks like a standard question, but I couldn't find clear directions anywhere. I have java code trying to connect to a server with probably self-signed (or expired) certificate. The code reports the following error : As I understand it, I have to use keytool and tell java that it's OK to allow this connection. All instructions to fix this problem assume I'm fully proficient with keytool, such as generate private key for server and import it into keystore Is there anybody who could post detailed instructions? I'm running unix, so bash script would be best. Not sure if it's important, but code executed in jboss.
Java: how can I split an ArrayList in multiple small ArrayLists? How can I split an ArrayList (size=1000) in multiple ArrayLists of the same size (=10) ?
Where to find Java JDK Source Code? I would like to see what a method in the Java API does. So I want the JDK Source Code. Before I re-installed Linux I had the src.zip package with all the official source code in it. I just had to tell Eclipse where this file is and I could see the code. But now I don't have the file anymore... So the question is: Where can I find it?
Spring - using static final fields (constants) for bean initialization is it possible to define a bean with the use of static final fields of CoreProtocolPNames class like this: If it is possible, what is the best way of doing this ?
How can I use "" in javadoc without formatting? If I write <xmlElement> in a javadoc, it does not appear, because tags have special functions on formatting texts. How can I show this chars in a javadoc?
Generic type parameter naming convention for Java (with multiple chars)? In some interfaces i wrote I'd like to name generic type parameter with more than one character to make the code more readable. Something like.... Instead of this... But when it comes to methods, the type-parameters look like java-classes which is also confusing. This seems like Key and Value are classes. I found or thought of some notations, but nothing like a convention from sun or a general best-practice. Alternatives i guesed of or found...
Why are Python exceptions named "Error"? Why are Python exceptions named "Error" (e.g. ZeroDivisionError, NameError, TypeError) and not "Exception" (e.g. ZeroDivisionException, NameException, TypeException). I come from a Java background and started to learn Python recently, as such this is confusing because in Java there is a distinction between errors and exceptions. Is there a difference in Python also or not?
How to match "any character" in Java Regular Expression? The following should be matched: can I do: ".*123" ?
How to extract CN from X509Certificate in Java? I am using a SslServerSocket and client certificates and want to extract the CN from the SubjectDN from the client's X509Certificate. At the moment I call cert.getSubjectX500Principal().getName() but this of course gives me the total formatted DN of the client. For some reason I am just interested in the CN=theclient part of the DN. Is there a way to extract this part of the DN without parsing the String myself?
What is the default maximum heap size for Sun's JVM from Java SE 6? What is the default maximum heap size for Sun's JVM from Java SE 6 (i.e. equivalent to setting -Xmx)? Looks like for Java SE 5 with a server-class machine, it's Smaller of 1/4th of the physical memory or 1GB. Bonus question: Looks like for IBM's JVM you can ask it Can you similarly ask Sun's JVM? Edit: I used Runtime.getRuntime().maxMemory to confirm min(physical memory/4, 1G), referenced in Sun documentation.
Checking for a null int value from a Java ResultSet In Java I'm trying to test for a null value, from a ResultSet, where the column is being cast to a primitive int type. From the code fragment above, is there a better way to do this, and I assume that the second wasNull() test is redundant? Educate us, and Thanks
How to check a string against null in java? How can I check a string against null in java? I am using but it's not working.
Is the order guaranteed for the return of keys and values from a LinkedHashMap object? I know LinkedHashMap has a predictable iteration order (insertion order). Does the Set returned by LinkedHashMap.keySet() and the Collection returned by LinkedHashMap.values() also maintain this order?
MVC pattern on Android Is it possible to implement the modelviewcontroller pattern in Java for Android? Or is it already implemented through Activities? Or is there a better way to implement the MVC pattern for Android?
What's the reason I can't create generic array types in Java? What's the reason Java doesn't allow us to do I could understand .NET didn't allow us to do that, as in .NET you have value types that at run-time can have different sizes, but in Java all kinds of T will be object references, thus having the same size (correct me if I'm wrong). What is the reason?
Can you have 2 completely independent instances of Eclipse running at the same time? I'm sure there isn't really a way to do this, but figured it doesn't hurt to ask... I use Eclipse a lot. I'm currently using it for both Java and Python (with PyDev). I often find that I have one project open, with lots of files, say in Java... And then for some reason I have to switch to a Python project for a bit. I want to leave my Java project the way it is, and I don't just want to open tons of Python files in the same place because then I have too much open at once and get a headache and confused. Is there any way I can just leave the Java project exactly the way it is, and sort of open a completely new session of Eclipse? (sort of the way you can do with a browser) Or is this just wishful thinking?
Java how to replace 2 or more spaces with single space in string and delete leading spaces only Looking for quick, simple way in Java to change this string to something that looks like this where I replace all those multiple spaces with a single space, except I also want the one or more spaces at the beginning of string to be gone. Something like this gets me partly there but not quite.
Why does Hibernate require no argument constructor? The no-argument constructor is a requirement (tools like Hibernate use reflection on this constructor to instantiate objects). I got this hand-wavy answer but could somebody explain further? Thanks
How to get the first day of the current week and month? I have the date of several events expressed in milliseconds[1], and I want to know which events are inside the current week and the current month, but I can't figure out how to obtain the first day (day/month/year) of the running week and convert it to milliseconds, the same for the first day of the month.
Sending POST data in Android I'm experienced with PHP, JavaScript and a lot of other scripting languages, but I don't have a lot of experience with Java or Android. I'm looking for a way to send POST data to a PHP script and display the result.
Getting the 'external' IP address in Java I'm not too sure how to go about getting the external IP address of the machine as a computer outside of a network would see it. My following IPAddress class only gets the local IP address of the machine. setIpAdd toString getHostAddress getLocalHost
Studies of relative costs for development in different languages Has anyone seen a recent (and fairly balanced) study into the relative costs for software development using differing languages ? I would particular like to see the relative costs of Java Vs. C# Vs. Delphi.
Is it wrong to use Deprecated methods or classes in Java? I am using eclipse to develop a web application. Just today I have updated my struts version by changing the JAR file. I am getting warnings at some places that methods are deprecated, but the code is working fine. I want to know some things Is it wrong to use Deprecated methods or classes in Java? What if I don't change any method and run my application with warnings that I have, will it create any performance issue.
Check if table exists I have a desktop application with a database embedded in it. When I execute my program I need to check that specific table exists, or create it if not. Given a Connection object named conn for my database, how could I check this?
How to convert current date into string in java? How do I convert the current date into string in Java?
Static Block in Java I was looking over some code the other day and I came across: Coming from C++, I had no idea why that was there. Its not an error because the code compiled fine. What is this "static" block of code?
What is the use of adding a null key or value to a HashMap in Java? HashMap allows one null key and any number of null values. What is the use of it?
Is null check needed before calling instanceof Will null instanceof SomeClass return false or throw a NullPointerException
Samples of Scala and Java code where Scala code looks simpler/has fewer lines? I need some code samples (and I also really curious about them) of Scala and Java code which show that Scala code is more simple and concise then code written in Java (of course both samples should solve the same problem). If there is only Scala sample with comment like "this is abstract factory in Scala, in Java it will look much more cumbersome" then this is also acceptable. Thanks! I like most of all accepted and this answers
difference between SPI and API? What is the difference between Service Provider Interface (SPI) and Application Programming Interface (API)? More specifically, for Java libraries, what makes them an API and/or SPI?
How to add parameters to a HTTP GET request in Android? I have a HTTP GET request that I am attempting to send. I tried adding the parameters to this request by first creating a BasicHttpParams object and adding the parameters to that object, then calling setParams( basicHttpParms ) on my HttpGet object. This method fails. But if I manually add my parameters to my URL (i.e. append ?param1=value1&param2=value2) it succeeds. I know I'm missing something here and any help would be greatly appreciated.
does java have something similar to C# properties? C# properties (I mean get and set methods) are a very useful feature. does java have something similar to C# properties too. I mean how we can implement something like the following C# code in java: thank you in advance
Why do I get an UnsupportedOperationException when trying to remove an element from a List? I have this code: I get this: How would be this the correct way? Java.15
assert vs. JUnit Assertions Today I saw a JUnit test case with a java assertion instead of the JUnit assertionsAre there significant advantages or disadvantages to prefer one over the other?
final transient fields and serialization Is it possible to have final transient fields that are set to any non-default value after serialization in Java? My usecase is a cache variable  that's why it is transient. I also have a habit of making Map fields that won't be changed (i.e. contents of the map is changed, but object itself remains the same) final. However, these attributes seem to be contradictory  while compiler allows such a combination, I cannot have the field set to anything but null after unserialization. I tried the following, without success: simple field initialization (shown in the example): this is what I normally do, but the initialization doesn't seem to happen after unserialization; initialization in constructor (I believe this is semantically the same as above though); assigning the field in readObject()  cannot be done since the field is final. In the example cache is public only for testing. println readObject java.io java.util writeObject toByteArray Output:
String, StringBuffer, and StringBuilder Please tell me a real time situation to compare String, StringBuffer, and StringBuilder?
A KeyValuePair in Java I'm looking for a KeyValuePair class in Java. Since java.util heavily uses interfaces there is no concrete implementation provided, only the Map.Entry interface. Is there some canonical implementation I can import? It is one of those "plumbers programming" classes I hate to implement 100x times.
Java: Clear the console Can any body please tell me what code is used for clear screen in Java? For example in C++ What code is used in Java for clear screen? Thanks!
Create a GUID in Java What are some of the best ways to create a GUID in Java?
com.mysql.jdbc.exceptions.jdbc4.CommunicationsException: Communications link failure I'm working on getting my database to talk to my Java programs. Can someone give me a quick and dirty sample program using the JDBC? I'm getting a rather stupendous error: Contents of the test file: java.sql.Connection println java.sql.Statement java.sql.DriverManager getConnection com.mysql.jdbc java.sql.SQLException java.sql.ResultSet java.sql.PreparedStatement Class.forName( "com.mysql.jdbc.Driver" ); do this in init edit the jdbc url Statement st = conn.createStatement(); ResultSet rs = st.executeQuery( "select from table" );
How can I interrupt a ServerSocket accept() method? In my main thread I have a while(listening) loop which calls accept() on my ServerSocket object, then starts a new client thread and adds it to a Collection when a new client is accepted. I also have an Admin thread which I want to use to issue commands, like 'exit', which will cause all the client threads to be shut down, shut itself down, and shut down the main thread, by turning listening to false. However, the accept() call in the while(listening) loop blocks, and there doesn't seem to be any way to interrupt it, so the while condition cannot be checked again and the program cannot exit! Is there a better way to do this? Or some way to interrupt the blocking method?
What are the differences between ArrayList and Vector? What are the differences between the two data structures ArrayList and Vector, and where should you use each of them?
Difference between FetchType LAZY and EAGER in Java Persistence API? I am a newbie to Java Persistence API and Hibernate. What is the difference between FetchType.LAZY and FetchType.EAGER in Java Persistence API?
Android: How to stretch an image to the screen width while maintaining aspect ratio? I want to download an image (of unknown size, but which is always roughly square) and display it so that it fills the screen horizontally, and stretches vertically to maintain the aspect ratio of the image, on any screen size. Here is my (non-working) code. It stretches the image horizontally, but not vertically, so it is squashed... downloaded from server mainImageView.setAdjustViewBounds(true); with this line enabled, just scales image down
Getting a lightweight installation of Java Eclipse Having dealt with yet another stupid eclipse problem, I want to try to get the lightest, most minimal Eclipse installation as possible. To be clear, I use eclipse for two things: Editing Java Debugging Java Everything else I do through Emacs/Zsh (editing JSP/XML/JS, file management, SVN check-in, etc). I have not found any aspect of working in Eclipse to do these tasks to be efficient or even reliable, so I do not want plug-ins that relate to it. From the eclipse.org site, this is the lightest install of eclipse that they have, and I don't want any of those things (Bugzilla, Mylyn, CVS xml_ui), and have actually had problems with each of them even though I do not use them. So what is the minimal build I can get that will: Ignore SVN metadata Includes the full-featured editor (intellisense and type-finding) Includes the full-featured debugger (standard Eclipse/JDK) Does not have any extra plug-ins, platforms, or "integrations" with other platforms, specifically, I don't want to deal with plug-ins relating to: Maven, JSP Validation, Javascript editing or validation, CVS or SVN, Mylyn, Spring or Hibernate "natures", app servers like a bundled Tomcat/GlassFish/etc, J2EE tools, or anything of the like. I do primarily Spring/Hibernate/web-mvc apps, and have never dealt with an Eclipse plug-in that handles any of it gracefully, I can work effectively with my own toolset, but Eclipse extensions do nothing but get in the way. I have worked with plain eclipse up to Ganymede, MyEclipse (up to 7.5), and the latest version of Spring-SourceTools, and find that they are all saddled with buggy useless plug-ins (though the combination is always different). Switching to NetBeans/Intellij is not an option, and my teammates work with SVN-controlled .class/.project files, so it pretty much has to be Eclipse. Does anyone have any good advice on how I can save a few grey hairs?
Java Constructor Style (Check parameters aren't null) What are the best practices if you have a class which accepts some parameters but none of them are allowed to be null? The following is obvious but the exception is a little unspecific: ... Here the exceptions let you know which parameter is null, but the constructor is now pretty ugly: ... Here the constructor is neater, but now the constructor code isn't really in the constructor: setTwo setOne ... ... Which of these styles is best? Or is there an alternative which is more widely accepted?
Java HTTP Client Request with defined timeout I would like to make BIT (Built in tests) to a number of server in my cloud. I need the request to fail on large timeout. How should I do this with java? Trying something like the below does not seem to work. println nodeBIT toString execute setIntParameter getParams -- EDIT: Clarify what library is being used -- I'm using httpclient from apache, here is the relevant pom.xml section
How does Java handle integer underflows and overflows and how would you check for it? How does Java handle integer underflows and overflows? Leading on from that, how would you check/test that this is occurring?
Increase permgen space I am working with tomcat 6.0, and while I am indexing (not while i am starting tomcat), I have a permgen space error. How could I increase that space?? Thanks
What does the question mark in Java generics' type parameter mean? This is a small snippet of code taken from some of the examples that accompany the Stanford Parser. I've been developing in Java for about 4 years, but have never had a very strong understanding of what this style of code is supposed to indicate. I'm not worried about the details of the code. What I'm confused about is what exactly the generic expression is supposed to convey, in English. Can someone explain this to me?
Tomcat startup logs - SEVERE: Error filterStart how to get a stack trace? When I start Tomcat I get the following error: It seems odd that the logs for Tomcat would not include a stack trace. Does somebody have a suggestion for how to increase the logging in Tomcat to get stack traces for errors like this?
What does the "assert" keyword do? What does assert do? For example in the function:
How should I escape strings in JSON? When creating JSON data manually, how should I escape string fields? Should I use something like Apache Commons Lang's StringEscapeUtilities.escapeHtml, StringEscapeUtilities.escapeXml, or should I use java.net.URLEncoder? The problem is that when I use SEU.escapeHtml, it doesn't escape quotes and when I wrap the whole string in a pair of 's, a malformed JSON will be generated.
